(dp0
I0
(dp1
S'name'
p2
S'Pets & Animals'
p3
sS'samples'
p4
(lp5
VHealth Complaints Pit bull attacked another small dog on seawall causing over a thousand in vet bills.  I thought the dog warden needed to be called but apparently police said that was not true.  Dog still being walked in the neighborhood right after attack.
p6
aVDog on the loose/ lost Husky mix seen running around Perkins Street 4/17 at 7 pm. Has collar on. Afraid / runs away when approached. 
p7
aV"Mila" Missing-Church Street area New Haven,CT Missing/Lost Tabby Car- MILA. 3 Years Old. Mila is an indoor cat - declawed. She was lacking a collar. \u000a\u000aReward for her safe return! Last seen at her home - Church Street area. \u000a\u000a203 887 0491 cell 
p8
aVOther - Stray/Roaming Dog When walking my dog, I sometimes see this dog wandering free along Wooster Street. It seems to be happening  more frequently lately. I won't approach it to check it's collar because my dog has already been attacked once by an off-leash dog. \u000a\u000aDoes anybody know to whom it belongs?  I am concerned about it, especially in this cold weather. \u000a\u000aI have also left a message at the animal shelter about this. 
p9
aVLost Dog Yorkshire Terrier; female; black/tan; no collar; no microchip
p10
aVOther The guy that lives next door has a dog. That I hear all the time screaming and crying all the time is in my belief he's doing some thing to the dog. I really don't know because I'm not in the house with him but I can hear it at my residence
p11
aVDogs running loose/barking There's two small dogs from this house that have been running throughout the neighborhood for the past week. They run up on women walking their children and/or leashed dogs. Whether their in their yard (unleashed) or running around, they're constantly barking. Hopefully, Animal control can stop by and eduction the owner about the leash law and barking ordinance. 
p12
aVDog lost near Wooster Sq.  Our dog, Leopold, got away Tuesday, 7/29/2014, in the Wooster Sq. area. If local residents and municipal workers can keep an eye out for him and help us get him home it would be greatly appreciated. He is a medium large black, grey and white Bearded Collie (like a sheep dog). New Haven Animal Shelter can be reached at (203) 946-8110 or contact us directly at (802)595-5358.
p13
aVResponsible Dog Owners This doesn't require the City to fix anything, but is intended for dog owners. I recently watched a woman let her bulldog poop in an area within a few feet of the apartments at the corner of Greene & Olive. She began to walk away, leaving her dog's dirt behind. When I said something, her entitled response was "no one will step in it there." Dog owners, no rationalizations now. If your dog poops, clean up after it. You are the reason that dog owners are oftentimes viewed with disrespect.
p14
aVCat I came upon an oatmeal cat wandering Greene Street. She/he seemed lost but well taken care of. No collar but clean and well fed. Are you looking for your cat? Sweet and friendly.
p15
aVfound her wandering around the street Very friendly dog, but had no tags on her collar. She looked like she may have been pregnant. She has white markings around her mouth and eyes. Will be taken to the East Haven animal shelter in case anyone is looking for her. 
p16
assI1
(dp17
g2
S'Tree Trimming, Tree Removal & Stumps'
p18
sg4
(lp19
VTrimming Tree located across from 164 Dover and is hanging over onto neighbor's property
p20
aVTree Trimming 
p21
aVMissing tree Does anybody know what happened to the city tree on the street between 19 and 29 Grand Av?  It seems to be missing! 
p22
aVremoval UI/Asplundh Walk
p23
aVTree Trimming tree is located on the 5th Street side
p24
aVTree Trimming house clearance
p25
aVstump 
p26
aVstump 
p27
aVTree Trimming ward 24
p28
aVTree Trimming 
p29
aVTree Trimming 2-3 trees a/f from address needs trimming
p30
aVstump 
p31
aVremoval UI Walk
p32
aVTree Trimming 
p33
aVTree Trimming 
p34
aVdying tree 
p35
aVstump 
p36
aVremoval UI Walk
p37
aVTree Trimming Two maple trees, both unhealthy, growing into and around wiring and with large roots cracking sidewalks.  New sidewalks are currently being installed today, but roots may need to be dealt with prior to putting new sidewalks in.
p38
aVTree Trimming ward 24
p39
aVTrim Tree is interfering with the UI cable connection from pole to pole ... need inspection asap so UI can proceed with the installation of an electric meter and wiring, UI inspector told resident this\u000aTree is located on the left side of the pole
p40
aVTree trimmed not removed I sent in several requests to have the tree removed from in front of 35 parker place. It was marked to come down Last fall and it hasn't been taken care of... they trimmed it a bit today but it needs to be removed I have replaced the sidewalk twice already. I refuse to do it again till the tree is taken care of.
p41
aVTrimming 
p42
aVTree Trimming 
p43
aVRemoval & Trim entering the one way circular drive there is a dead tree on the left hand side, near the church sidewalk is 2 trees that need trimming
p44
aVTree Trimming Resident that lives at 15 Winchester Ave said there is a City Tree touching electrical wires and he wants the City to cut down these branches before anything happens. 
p45
aVTree blocking view of intersection Dangerous Intersection! Cars on Fairfield can not see around the leaves and downed tree at the corner of Dayton Street! It has been her for over a year...There is a school bus stop here as well as many elderly and handicapped pedestrians who use this corner. Please address immediately!
p46
aVTree Trimming 
p47
aVdead branches The majority of the tree has dead branches and needs to be examined
p48
aVleaning tree top heavy on one side, leaning toward house\u000aplease inspect asap for hazard\u000a***resident would like to be contacted for consultation***
p49
aVTree Trimming/removal 
p50
aVTree Removal Tree has mold & has grown into power lines. Branches are constantly falling. The tree is becoming dangerous for cars,  people walking by and power lines.
p51
aVTrimming Long branches squirrel jumping onto home. 
p52
aVTree Trimming Tree trimming requested - in the power lines and low hanging to ground. Only 6' of clearance as you walk by. 
p53
aVTree Trimming 
p54
aVTRIMMING 
p55
aVOther - city responsibility Owner of property destroys public tree. Nobody in the Parks Dept to prevent further destruction. Could somebody please check this out
p56
aVremoval roots...growing through lawn and driveway, resident is requesting tree be removed...roots are causing a tripping hazard and sewer problems
p57
aVTree Trimming City tree is destroying roof of resident's home needs to be trimmed back.
p58
aVTree Trimming 
p59
aVStump 
p60
aVTRIMMING 
p61
aVTree Trimming 
p62
aVTree Removal / UI 
p63
aVTree Trimming ward 19
p64
aVTree Trimming 
p65
aVtree trimming wire clearance resident will also be contacting UI
p66
aVTree Trimming ward 19
p67
aVTrimming 
p68
aVTree debris 
p69
aVTree Trimming 
p70
aVstump 
p71
aVTree Trimming Tree branches from 175 Alden are hitting power and cable lines on 179 Alden.
p72
aVTree Trimming the sycamore tree branches are touching my house
p73
aVTRIMMING 
p74
aVremoval UI Whitney Substation
p75
aVstump 
p76
aVTree Trimming 
p77
aVTrim handicap sign blocked by a tree
p78
aVOvergrown vegetation Residents need to trim back weeds and shrubs. Vegetation is like a jungle all the way to the curb. Can't walk through and can't see around. Oncoming vehicle traffic not visible, so very dangerous.
p79
aVTree Trimming ward 30 + 27
p80
aVTree Trimming house clearance
p81
aVTree Trimming 
p82
aVTrimming 
p83
aVTree Trimming Tree limbs hanging. Dangerous for sidewalk pedestrians and utility lines
p84
aVremoval UI Walk 5/6/15
p85
aVstump 
p86
aVTree Trimming dead limbs
p87
aVTree Trimming ward 21
p88
aVSafety hazard Tree roots destroying sidewalk and private property. New Haven Department of Public Works refuses to acknowledge, much less fix the problem, which has been known by them for almost 2 years. FIX it, FIX it, Fix it.
p89
aVTree Trimming 
p90
aVTree Trimming tree roots vs sidewalk
p91
aVBranches Branches were not  picked up since Storm Sandi
p92
aVTrim 
p93
aVFallen Tree in West River Needs Removal There is a large fallen tree blocking the flow of the West River just below Derby Avenue. It is collecting a huge amount of trash, and also blocks canoe access in this area.
p94
aVStump 
p95
aVTree Trimming ward 21
p96
aVTrimming Tree located across from this address needs to be trimmed
p97
aVTree Trimming 
p98
aVTree trimmed The tree in front of my house was trimmed it needed to be taken down these trees were never taken care of by the city never trimmed now the dead wood on it proves this tree needs to go it has fallen branches all the time Russel st has many trees in distress please rethink the way these trees are slated as bad or dead be pro active before they get worst winter is coming thank you
p99
aVTree Trimming GRACE;  There  are 2 very large old trees  outside  of  these  residence  that  are  on  City  ground  and overhang  into  the  yard,  there  are  many  branches  both  big  and  small  that  need  to  be  trimmed  back   and  / or  cut  all  the  way  off.  This  issue  was  reported  last  year  also,  when  the  tree's  along  the  main  road  were  being  cut  back; Told  we  would  have  to  put  in  separate  work  order,  did  that ????? limbs  are  still  breaking  off.   Please  we  need  your  help.  Thank  you 
p100
aVremoval UI Walk
p101
aVstump 
p102
aVTree Trimming 
p103
aVTree REMOVAL 
p104
aVOther - city responsibility in front of the Clinton ave apts. 60-70  a tree has been hacked holes have been drilled into the base. please have someone come and remove this tree before it falls and hurts someone\u000a thank you
p105
aVremoval resident is requesting that the tree at address be removed because it is on the water meter for his home...Water company cant need access the meter to turn it off
p106
aVTree Trimming 
p107
aVTree Trimming Dumpster collection from Trumbull College  caught elm tree branch on York.  Limb dangling dangerously over street / sidewalk
p108
aVStump 
p109
aVTree Trimming ward 24
p110
aVstump 
p111
aVLarge dead branch should be trimmed 8-10" diameter dead branch overhangs Lawncrest Road. Hoping it can be removed before it falls on its own.
p112
aVTRIMMING 
p113
aVpossibly dead across from address\u000amushrooms growing around trunk of the tree
p114
aVTree Trimming Huge dead branches and limbs began falling off the tree this afternoon.
p115
aVTree Trimming 
p116
aVleaning tree All trees are located on the Woodward Avenue side\u000a3rd tree from corner is leaning toward home...possible structure hazard, please inspect asap\u000a1st and 2nd tree needs to be trimmed
p117
aVStump removal City cut down tree outside 46 Cleveland Road, but has not removed stump. Sprouts are growing obscuring view of street for cars in neighbor's driveway.
p118
aVTree Trimming 
p119
aVTree Trimming tree is located on the Gibbs Street side
p120
aVBranches Not Collected  Several residents in this area report that branches have not been collected at this address. 
p121
aVstump 
p122
aVDead Norway Maple; needs to be REMOVED; 4th St.; Tree Trimming There is a nearly-dead Norway Maple in front of 72-74 Fourth Street. Resident-homeowner fears that this tree will fall on her home if it remains for another winter and/or hurricane season. (Hurricane season begins in June and typically revs up in August, so it would be great to get this removed ASAP. Thanks.)
p123
aVTree Trimming limbs over sidewalk, and nearing wires
p124
aVTree Trimming wire/house clearance
p125
aVTree Trimming 
p126
aVTree Trimming large falling limbs onto cars 
p127
aVTree debris 
p128
aVTree Trimming large limb from the oak tree is leaning onto residents pear tree in backyard
p129
aVStump 
p130
aVremoval UI/Asplundh Walk
p131
aVTRIMMING 
p132
aVTree Trimming / Removal UI Trimming
p133
aVstump 
p134
assI2
(dp135
g2
S'Potholes, Sinkholes, Manholes & Other Street Damage and Road Obstructions'
p136
sg4
(lp137
VPotholes This area is terrible to drive through on both sides. The potholes are hard to avoid and can cause serious damage to your car, at the same time your pockets on repairs.  Its a shame to drive through suburban areas nice paved streets then get to the urban areas and feel like a obstacle course.
p138
aVPotholes I have reported this block of streets and others have for the last few months. You guys have said it is on the repaving list. PLEASE fill these potholes, until the "supposed" repaving takes place. This set of blocks is by far the worst potholes in the city.  
p139
aVPotholes On Vista Terrace at the corner of Fountain is a huge pothole making it very difficult to turn into Vista Terrace.  I saw the truck 2-3 days ago and told them (they were only 2 blocks away) and they said they would fill it but did not.
p140
aV3.50 lip There is a 3.50 inch lip from sidewalk to new paved rd. left many messages for Jeff and no return call. One employee already sprained there ankle,and custormer fell. We have trailers and motorcycle that come in and out of our parking lot that we pay taxes on. Please contact me
p141
aVPotholes Two very deep holes have shown up next to one another at the intersection of Fountain / Alden / Harrison, in the eastbound lane of Fountain right before the traffic light. There is additional buckling to its right.  Very deep and practically impossible to avoid!
p142
aVPotholes There are several Pothole on this street that need to be filled
p143
aVBig pothole under 91 There's a new, wide (a few feet), and decently deep pothole in the bike lane under 91.  
p144
aVPotholes need to be fixed.  there are potholes everywhere on that street. 
p145
aVPotholes There are potholes lining the entire stretch of Essex Street. Please send a crew to this location to patch them
p146
aVPotholes Huge pothole on I-95 North as you merge with I-91 south, in the far right lane, almost lost control of my car the pothole was so deep and there was no way to avoid it due to traffic. Saw it yesterday, July 15, 2014 at 2:30 pm.  
p147
aVHorrible Pothole Patchwork Last week New Haven PW came down my street and dropped some patch into the deep craters on my street. When I say dropped , I mean they literally took a shovel or two full of patch, threw it into the hole and moved onto the next one. They didn't bother to tamp it down or anything and now less than a week later, all the patch is gone and the holes are worse than they were before! You literally have to weave down my street to avoid damage to your vehicle. Can someone please come back out and PROPERLY patch these holes?!
p148
aVPotholes Large holes need to be fixed up and down Ella T Grasso near Glen Road
p149
aVCave St - no parking on even side The no parking signs need to be put back up on the even side of the street, especially in front of 18 Cave.  Driveways are blocked and street becomes to narrow for safe passage. 
p150
aVPotholes There are clusters of potholes on Sperry Street between Dickerman and Whalley. Please patch them as soon as possible.
p151
aVSinkhole  Resident reports a deep, wide sinkhole at the intersection of Grand Avenue and Hamilton Street. 
p152
aVPotholes All of Warwick & Burwell Street  are riddled with potholes.  Some are so large they take up half the road.  This is creating a\u000adangerous situation.
p153
aVRepaving Request  Resident reports that Cooper Place is deteriorating and is need of immediate repaving. Please have an official inspect the area as soon as possible.
p154
aVPotholes Huge pothole at corner of Mary Wade Home
p155
aVPotholes 
p156
aVstreet still falling apart my yard washing away 7 years now The street has been cut up many   up many times by the Gas Company and was supposed to be repave 3 years ago they keep telling me. meanwhile we are bordered by one way street on each side of us and we bear the bulk of the traffic between Woodward and Townsend ave. the crown in the road is so back that the area in front of my residence is settled so much it is washing away my yard, I have submitted picture after picture to the city and the Highway dept to come up with a fix, maybe curbs or at the least enough  asphalt to built the road back up where it has sunk.\u000a
p157
aVPotholes Many wide and deep holes on street
p158
aVplease fix at the beginning of Clinton Ave in Fairhaven ct, there are multiple massive potholes and divits that really need to be fixed. They streatch up the road past Clinton Ave school. They are doing a job on everyones car. 
p159
aVIcy/Slick Roads UNSafety Roads coated with Black Ice
p160
aVPotholes Resident reports numerous potholes on Fairfield Street (entire street). The resident would like to have the potholes patched, and have the street scheduled for repaving. 
p161
aVDeep Potholes The whole street of Winchester from Bassett Street to Cave Street and beyond. 
p162
aVpot hole  Pot hole at  bottom of Rd\u000a.\u000aPl fix....
p163
aVA slew of potholes More pics in comments.
p164
aVPotholes There is a minor sinkhole developing on Howe St at Elm St on the south side of the intersection (middle of the crosswalk). It looks like it was cold patched recently, but I think it might need more substantive work since it has already sunk a few inches since being patched. 
p165
aVDamaged Street Mountain Rd has an opening in the road from previous work, it damages the car while driving, please repair the street.  The street has been in this condition for at least 3 months, not acceptable.
p166
aVPotholes There are a couple of deep potholes right in front of 264 Cranston street in New Haven, near Cranston and Quinnipiac.
p167
aVPotholes Still full of potholes from Elm to Whalley.
p168
aVRoad needs paving The entire stretch of West Woods Road from Whitney Avenue to Downs Road (border with Bethany) could use major repair.  In some areas the entire road needs to be repaved, and has not been done in years.  Previous attempts were merely quick patches, which eventually turn to bigger potholes.  This road is used by trucks and cars alike as a major shortcut between northern Hamden / Cheshire to Westville area of New Haven and Merritt Pkwy southbound from Westville.\u000aThe section of W Woods Rd from Shepard Avenue to Downs is especially bad in numerous spots.
p169
aVPotholes Large pothole on Conrad.  Near the intersection of Ray Rd. and Conrad
p170
aVPotholes The entire street is a giant pot hole! 
p171
aVPotholes Potholes at corner of Fairfield and Green HIll Terrace near stop sign(as you are turning right from Green Hill onto Fairfield), also pothole on corner of Fairfield and Fowler, as you turn right from Fairfield onto Fowler
p172
aVPublic Space & Streets Sink hole just recently filled is already sinking and cracking.
p173
aVTraffic/Road Safety The metal curb/barrier on the right side as you drive along the river has been hit and pushed out so that it nearly intrudes on the lane of traffic.  Further along closer to Common Ground High School, the wood and wire barriers have been disturbed in several places so that the wood post are leaning quite close to the driving lane.  Both problems seem hazardous particularly if it snows and they catch plow blades. Also a problem if a car needs to move close to the side for large vehicles, pedestrians, etc.
p174
aVPotholes 
p175
aVPotholes pothole is within edge of utility patch on right tire side headed towards dixwell about 3-4  car lengths from intersection of dixwell
p176
aVMultiple Potholes Resident states that there are a continuous amount of potholes still present from last winter throughout Legion Avenue. 
p177
aVPotholes The City of New Haven Is littered with Potholes. Every Street is full. I have been a resident of New Haven for over 50 years and I have never seen such neglect of our City Roads. In addition this has been the year for the worst snow removal ever. If you drive through surrounding towns you will not see the abundance of poorly plowed streets. \u000aThe residents of the City of New Haven pay outrageous property tax, close to the highest in the country. What are we getting for our hard earned monies? Its ridiculous!!!!!
p178
aVDepressed manhole cover There is a depressed manhole cover in the middle of the intersection of Whalley and Sherman. It is reasonably deep and has been this way for a long time. cars try to avoid it and drift into the other traffic lane.
p179
aVPotholes There are few potholes along this stretch but this one is pretty deep. Sorry no photo. Was driving :)
p180
aVOther New telephone pole in between 88 - 100 Lawncrest Rd developing a sink hole around the base.  No number on pole
p181
aVa very large pot hole Pothole located on the  corner of Orchard and Edgewood ave.,\u000ahit  pothole damaged jeep!!!
p182
aVPotholes Resident reports potholes in the middle of this intersection. Please patch them as soon as possible.
p183
aVPot hole on Orange Street A traffic sign telling you to merge left drives you right into a deep pothole.\u000a\u000aBlew my tire out on my brand new car at almost 1am. Took photos this morning and someone else blew their tire while I was standing on the sidewalk. 
p184
aVSidewalks and Curb damage The road surface in front of my house is completely deteriorated. There is little curbing left and large areas where the asphalt comes up in chunks with each street sweeping or snow plowing.
p185
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Manhole loose in the right lane near the traffic light in front of facility.
p186
aVHUGE pothole I'm pretty sure numerous cars have been damaged due to the pothole. Not to mention the danger it poses to bicyclist.
p187
aVPotholes Deep potholes all throughout Winchester Avenue. Also, Corner of Winchester and Bassett was patched up but not good enough, road is extremely bumpy.
p188
aVSmall hole needs filling I hit this darn hole almost every time I go around this corner. It's in just the right spot to jolt my car. Can it be filled? 
p189
aVHole in the Street  There is a large hole in the street located next to the sewer grate. Please send someone to this location to patch the hole. 
p190
aVPotholes 
p191
aVPotholes Potholes on Cold Spring Street about half-way between Whitney and Everit. They are on the even side of the street and given the number of cars that park along that stretch of Cold Spring Street, they are hard to miss and they are not good for the car!  Thank you to public works for taking care of this!
p192
aVPotholes Deep pothole and sinking area needs attention. 
p193
aVPotholes everywhere Can't drive down the street without hitting a pothole. 
p194
aVPotholes Numerous potholes along East Rock Park Road.
p195
aVPotholes Large pothole in front of 127 Burwell, very deep when traffic comes through throwing asphalt all over sidewalk, and damaging cars
p196
aVPotholes Resident of this block reports a large cluster of potholes at this location. The potholes are causing damage to passing vehicles. Please send someone to patch these potholes as soon as possible.
p197
aVStreet shame Morse Place street road conditions , Lack of upkeep and Maint. Chunks of asphalt in road
p198
aVPotholes Several wide deep potholes in lefthand lane of this very busy road.
p199
aVPavement sinking After repair of a water main break, the road in front of 230 Everit Street has developed a depression/pothole that is growing.
p200
aVPotholes on Goffe between Crescent and County Terrible potholes and badly patched and maintained road surface. I bike to work every morning and the potholes in this area are deep and dangerous.  
p201
aVLoose Manhole Cover Resident reports a loose manhole cover at this location. Please send someone to this location to secure it. 
p202
aVPotholes 
p203
aVOther - city responsibility FIX THE DARN POT HOLES THIS ROAD IS FLOODED AND TERRIBLE. HUGE HAZARDOUS POT HOLES. THE WHOLE ROAD IS NOTHING BUT POT HOLES . COME ON NEW HAVEN FIX THEM ITS GONNA TEAR UP CARS. 
p204
aVCity Front Loader Broke My Driveway Apron On 2/11 in the wake of the snowstorm the City Contractor that was clearing the snow with the big front loader broke up my front concrete driveway apron.Now there is a 6" drop off to the street. Can the pothole patrol come fix it so we can get in and out of the driveway with out damaging our cars??
p205
aVSink hole forming A sink hole is forming near the intersection of Huntington St. and Whitney Avenue, in front of the Red Cross building. 
p206
aVPotholes Several potholes located on Glen Road near intersection with Blvd. Patched before but need repatching.
p207
aVPotholes Deep potholes northbound on Whitney in front of Red Cross. City responded to last report saying this had been repaired, which was a lie. They have not been touched, except by the many tires every day making them deeper.
p208
aVRoad Cave-In  Resident reports road cave-in at this location. 
p209
aVPotholes There is a pothole near the curb at this location. 
p210
aVPotholes A huge foot long hole, maybe 4 inches deep. 
p211
aVLarge Bump in Street There is an extremely large bump on Mountain Rd below Victory Dr.. Its about 6" high. I believe its a resurfacing seam. A cone would be nice a warning sign would be better.
p212
aV2 very large and deep potholes There are 2 large potholes on the westbound lane of Humphrey St just east of East St.
p213
aVPotholes This is an area of potholes as are additional ones in the middle of Hubinger between Elm and West Park. Also near Hubinger on Elm. The street is merely a memory now.\u000a\u000aYou have sent pothole fillers to fix them, but as I saw, they merely dumped loose asphalt on the street and moved on. All the loose asphalt left the holes within a few days and has made the streets a further mess. \u000a\u000aEither get someone there to do the job right and pave the street or tell me that you have given up. Maybe I need to raise money from the neighborhood to pave the street.\u000a\u000aYou just can't do this job without paying attention and caring.
p214
aVPotholes This is actually on Pearl st near Orange
p215
aVPotholes On the corne of whalley & Winthrop ave a quite a few large, deep and wide potholes
p216
aVpot hole fix Huge pot hole...fix at once\u000a\u000a\u000aCorner of Lexington ave. N Revere street..
p217
assI3
(dp218
g2
S'Pedestrian Issues, Pedestrian Safety and Sidewalk Damage'
p219
sg4
(lp220
VSidewalks and Curb damage Sidewalk damaged by tree roots; uneven sidewalk with standing/pooling water in rain.
p221
aVtree stump and broken sidewalk repair large tree stump needs removing from fallen city tree as well as broken sidewalk repair...dangerous to pedestrians/children
p222
aVLack of sidewalks There are no sidewalks along the east side of Sherman Parkway alongside 339 W. Division Street between W. Division Street and Harding Place.  With a new homeowner moving into 339 W. Division Street shortly, the City should install this sideway as early in the spring as possible.
p223
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Slab of sidewalk is severely damaged and needs replacement. 
p224
aVBroken Sidewalk  Resident reports a broken sidewalk in front of this location. Tripping hazard. Please inspect this location as soon as possible.
p225
aVSidewalks There are three crumbling gaps in the sidewalk from Ann Taylor to Shake Shack. \u000a\u000aIt makes for a nice trip hazard and a speed bump for strollers.
p226
aVTraffic/Road Safety Overgrown bushes at house on corner make pulling out from Alston Avenue dangerous! View of oncoming traffic is obstructed especially turning left onto Edgewood. This seems to be an issue at a number of corners in this Ward. Is there a volunteer group for neighbors who would like help with yardwork? Maybe community service hours for high school kids?
p227
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Bluestone curbing was dislodged during the winter. The damage is located on the south side of Canner adjacet to Yale Divinity dormitory. Stone needs to be reset. The stone is lying on the grass next to the side walk. 
p228
aVUneven Sidewalks On the corner Court/Academy Street Sidewalks  uneven trip hazard
p229
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Prior repair of sidewalk and cutout is inadequate and still creates dangerous situation regarding falls.\u000a\u000aSidewalk and cutout blocks should be leveled and not simply tarred
p230
aVTraffic Signal / Pedestrian Signal Cars on S Frontage running red lights across College St during nearly every  traffic cycle. It is only a matter of time before a pedestrian is struck here. There is a strong need for red light cameras or a more active enforcement policy (if an officer were to sit here for 5 minutes, they would be guaranteed to see several offenders)
p231
aVPedestrian signal obscured The pedestrian signal on the southwest corner of Willow and Orange Streets is obscured by overgrown hedges and not visible to pedestrians crossing from the northwest side of Willow Street.
p232
aVPedestrian Signal or "Yield to Pedestrians" Sign Needed at Grove-Temple Intersection Please add a Pedestrian "Walk" signal or a "Yield to Pedestrians in Crosswalk" Sign at the corner of Temple and Grove Streets.  Currently, there is a large number of vehicles that turn right onto Grove Street from Temple St. during the morning rush.  However,  this traffic typically will not yield to pedestrians crossing Grove Street on a green light.  It is quite dangerous as a pedestrian, because the turning cars are in your blind spot, so you cannot see whether anyone is coming while you are crossing the road.  I have been repeatedly cut off by fast-moving cars turning in front of me when I am in the middle of the crosswalk.
p233
aVBroken, uneven sidewalk Sidewalk is broken and uneven. Problem is being caused by a large tree, whose roots have pushed the sidewalk apart, and is causing a hazard. These same tree roots are also causing damage to the gutter system of the house located at 206 Roydon Rd. These roots have infiltrated the gutter system from the ground up
p234
aVWalk light not long enough / red light run continually 12 seconds is not long enough to cross for many people, especially considering that many times the cars driving through will blow the red light and cut three or four seconds off the time you have to walk across the road; you cannot cross if cars are still driving through the intersection, whether the walk light is on or not.\u000a\u000aThe red light needs to be made longer, and the walk sign needs to be on longer.  At least 20 or 25 seconds would be more appropriate.
p235
aVTripping Hazard  Tree roots are reportedly pushing up the sidewalk. Possible tripping hazard. 
p236
aVextremely hazardous the sidewalk is extremely hazardous. extremely uneven up to 5 inches height difference, large pieces missing. needs immediate attention please! 
p237
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Sidewalk cracked and crumbling. Need inspection.
p238
aVDangerous broken rusty traffic sign base Sticking out of dirt at curb corner.  Sharp edges, hard to see, could easily cause tripping or emergency room visit for a bad cut.  Please remove asap.
p239
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Coop HS has sidewalks on three sides of its building but only clears the snow and ice around the doorway. WHy aren't they clearing the sidewalks?
p240
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains There is a 12 inch gap around the street storm drain where it appears to be a sinkhole forming. Concerned about kids who are playing in the area. Please inspect
p241
aVTraffic Signal / Pedestrian Signal There is no traffic signal, or crosswalk available at this intersection in any direction. However, it is a widely used intersection and it is very dangerous for pedestrians to have to run across the street, time the lights, etc.
p242
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Raised sidewalk on Edgewood Ave, in front of 121 McKinley Ave. Dangerous to pedestrians. Reported twice in the past 2 years but no action.
p243
aVTREE TREE CAME UP OUT GROUND ON WHITTLESEY AVE NEAR CORNER OF WHALLEY AVE BACK IN SEPT 2012 & FELL ON CAR.\u000aSIDEWALK IS LEFT IN THIS POOR CONDITION AS IF WE'RE WALKING ON A HILL
p244
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Damaged sidewalk from an uprooted tree
p245
aVicy sidewalk The Exxon gas station in Westville village has shoveled some of its sidewalk. But it hasn't touched the walk between its eastern drive way and Jewel St., which is an icy hazard. Shouldn't Exxon be fined?  
p246
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Sidewalk in front of residence is cracked and broken. Near new crosswalk one slab taken out when new signal was put in and was never replaced. Please inspect. 
p247
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains SEWER CAVING IN ON RIGHT SIDE,, RUSTED AND OLD FALLING APART ,,SOMEONE STEPS ON IT MIGHT GO IN,,NEED NEW GRATE  VERY SOON
p248
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Cracked sidewalk 
p249
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Crumbled corner at southeast corner of intersection of English and Rowe
p250
aVNo sidewalks on most of Seneca as it approaches Fowler Street This area is a disaster without any sidewalks!  The sidewalk ends midway down Seneca as it approaches Frederick and Fowler Streets.  It is not safe for walking on the street itself.  To make things worse, the city of new haven's school transportation system likes to have a bus-stop at Fowler/Frederick/Secena.  It is an accident waiting to happen.
p251
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Property on the corner George Street & Gilbert ave damage sidewalk from the tree root.  This is a very dangerous trip hazard needs immediate attention
p252
aVBroken Sidewalk  The sidewalk in front of this location is broken and in need of repairs. 
p253
aVTree needs trimming-Dead branches falling, interfering with wires, sidewalk is buckling into the road This tree needs to be trimmed at the least, possibly removed. The dead branches continually fall posing a risk to pedestrians.  The utility  wires are tangled in the tree. The sidewalk curb is broken due to roots. The sidewalk is also buckled. 
p254
aVSide-walk is heaving up dramatically There is a heaving sidewalk at 50 Exchange St and it could cause a significant tripping hazard.   What is a home-owners responsibility in this matter?
p255
aVDamaged/Destroyed sidewalk The sidewalk at the corner of Elm Street and Winthrop is destroyed. There are huge potholes and ridge like structure in the infrastructure. It is really bad and needs to be fix before it cause any bodily accident/incident.
p256
aVPedestrian Crossing button not working At the northwest corner (next to the Chinese market), the pedestrian crossing signal is not activated by the button.  This has been a continual problem on this corner.  It is reported, fixed, but then after a few months becomes unreliable whether it will activate the pedestrian crossing signal or not.
p257
aVentering wrong way \u000aEvery day when taking my child to school, you see a vehicle entering the school grounds the wrong way. parents at the school have been told about the entrance to the parking lot being on the chapel street side, and also residence who share the lot with the school know this too. recently there have been incidents where accidents almost happened and the person committing the illegal act is the one gettiing mad at someone doing the right thing. the lot is patrolled by new haven parking authority for people who don't have parking tags but as a parent, i feel something else should be done about this problem too seeing one day a child coming or going to school may get hit cause a driver wantss to take the quick way in. there are big wrong way signs posted for a reason.
p258
aVPolicing Issue Roosevelt restaurant customer driving up Bradley St on motorcycle wrong way then speeding down sidewalk. Extremely dangerous!
p259
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Repair damaged concrete at the curb cut for accessibility on the corner of Chapel and York streets that is close to the Yale Rep Theater.  Many people trip on the loose and cracked concrete.  The corner is very hard to navigate in a wheel chair or with a walker.
p260
aVNEEDS PEDESTRIAN CROSSING  Bus stop is on corner of Middletown Ave. southbound. and Barnes.  There is a light, but no pedestrian crosswalk.  A woman and her child were crossing this very busy street  when Middletown Ave had a green light, luckily, we all stopped to let her pass.  Please put crosswalk and maybe a walk sign, lots of families with children in Barnes Ave. area!
p261
aVPOOR BEYOND LIVABLE SIDEWALK CONDITION POOR UNSAFE CONDITION OF SIDEWALKS ON WHITTLESEY AVE BETWEEN BLAKE ST & WHALLEY AVE..\u000aOUR NEIGHBORHOOD KIDS  AREN'T SAFE ON THESE CITY SIDEWALKS IN WARD 27 ZONE 1  & ARE AT RISK OF A SERIOUS INJURY POSSIBLY A FATAL DEATH THAT COULD & SHOULD BE PREVENTED ASAP.\u000a\u000aTHANKS STAY ENCOURAGED, FOCUSED & BLESSED
p262
aVside walk For over 20 years i am trying to get my side walk fix and work has  been done from more land rd around to crescent st and stop within about 13 feet from my driveway  please can somebody do something about this THANK YOU
p263
aVDangerous crossing because of the set up between Whitney Ave and Audubon Street, there pedestrians are constantly dashing across Whitney Avenue - frequently while holding small children.  We need a crosswalk!
p264
aVTraffic/Road Safety The intersection at Elm and State Street is terrifically hazardous, especially crossing from Elm Street, across State Street near the WTNH building.  There is a walk light there, but 90% of the driver's blow throw the red light to turn right onto State Street, while people are crossing with the walk signal and have had 100's of near misses.  Can this ever be made a no turn on red intersection?  Can larger signs be put up to inform people that pedestrians have the right of way during a walk light?  
p265
aVSidewalk Hazard Sidewalk presents a trip hazard. Please inspect as soon as possible.
p266
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Busted wheelchair corner cutout to sidewalk and road. 
p267
aVneeds Traffic Signal / Pedestrian Signal!! The light at Willow and Whitney desperately needs a walk sign. It is so dangerous for pedestrians. I have almost been hit many times, caught in the middle of the street when the lights change suddenly; it's hard to guage without a walk sign and the cars can turn into you. Seen other people have the problem too. 
p268
aVCurb Damaged  Resident reports curb damage at this location. Says that soil from the tree belt is actually making its way on to the street. 
p269
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Major uneven sidewalks in front of 42 Academy Street ( 2 spots).  As a 70 year old living at this location, I almost fell as I tripped on the sidewalk.  Other seniors also live in the condo building. A patch is sorely and quickly needed.
p270
aVSidewalk and curb damage Resident reports sidewalk and curb damage due to uplifting tree roots. Tree was removed about three years ago by city workers and the stump is still in place, has not been removed.
p271
aVBroken Sidewalk  Resident reports a broken sidewalk in front of this location. Inspect requested as soon as possible.
p272
aVUnsafe Pedestrian Crossing I've been risking life and limb for years crossing Whitney Ave at Audubon Street. I need to get across there to an office, so going all the way to the end of the block to a crosswalk isn't viable. In fact I've seen MANY New Haven cops cross here, not to mention families going to CAW, ACES, and NMS. This intersection needs a crosswalk at minimum, an extra stoplight would help, and most of all, NO MORE DOUBLE PARKING on Whitney Ave.
p273
aVResidential sidewalk clearance Is there an ordinance about sidewalk clearing in residential neighborhoods? Some homeowners seem not to be doing their jobs to keep walks clear. Stretches like this one in front of 74 Lyon are going to get even uglier/ more dangerous for pedestrians once the temps drop again. 
p274
aVBroken Sidewalk the side walk outside of an elderly ladies home is crumbling and she is force to walk into the street to go around the sidewalk; making it very dangerous for her. PLEASE HELP!!!!!!!!!!!
p275
aVSidewalks and Curb damage The curb and sidewalk directly in front of our house continue to crumble and deteriorate.  The sidewalk is cracked and raised and presents a tripping hazard.  The curb is now missing 4'.   I have reported this problem in person, via telephone, and through SeeClickFix for the past three years, but nothing seems to get fixed.  \u000a\u000aThere is also a pothole approx 2' wide by 10' long directly in front of  the driveway apron.  Every time the street sweeper comes by they remove a little more pavement.\u000a\u000aIs it possible this is the season that these things finally get fixed?
p276
aV59 Thorn Street  Resident reports that the sidewalk in front of this location is damaged. Possible tripping hazard exists. Inspection requested. 
p277
aVVehicles fail to stop for pedestrians in the crosswalk  Vehicles regularly fail to stop for pedestrians in the crosswalks across Temple Street at the intersection of Wall Street.  
p278
aVSidewalks Damaged  Resident reports a damaged sidewalk in front of this location. Inspection needed as soon as possible. Repairs are requested. 
p279
aVRef. # W025018-082211 - 3rd Year Unaddressed Sidewalk damage from all 3 curbside trees\u000a\u000aThe sidewalk is cracked and heaved out of place in multiple locations on both sides of the corner lot at 39 Beaver Hill Lane (one tree on Beaver Hill Lane and two trees on Roger White Drive). This was already reported in 2011, Ref. # W025018-082211. I also asked my Alderman for assistance last year and again this year.  He has pictures and agreed repairs are needed, but no progress has been made.  Please make the necessary repairs now (this spring/summer) as they are unreasonably overdue. 
p280
aVstump 
p281
aVPOOR BEYOND LIVABLE SIDEWALKS CONDITION POOR UNSAFE CONDITION OF SIDEWALKS ON WHITTLESEY AVE BETWEEN BLAKE ST & WHALLEY AVE..\u000aOUR NEIGHBORHOOD KIDS  AREN'T SAFE ON THESE CITY SIDEWALKS IN WARD 27 ZONE 1  & ARE AT RISK OF A SERIOUS INJURY POSSIBLY A FATAL DEATH THAT COULD & SHOULD BE PREVENTED ASAP.\u000a\u000aTHANKS STAY ENCOURAGED, FOCUSED & BLESSED
p282
aVBroken Sidewalk The sidewalk in front of this location is broken and in need of repairs. Inspection requested. 
p283
aVBegan Sidewalk Repair But Did Not Finish Resident complains that sidewalk was only partially repaired, needs to be finished, damage is still a hazard. 
p284
aVraised crosswalk and paint striping needed at Ashmun and Lake please stripe and add traffic calming measures. 
p285
aVBad sidewalk Sidewalk cracked and very unsafe, particularly in low lighting conditions 
p286
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings The yield to pedestrians sign has gone missing from the crosswalk across Chapel at DePalma. 
p287
aVCurb repair Curb needs to be repaired at 551 Woodward Avenue. please inspect.
p288
aVPedestrian light not working properly at 800 Howard At baseline, the pedestrian light takes a very long time to come on and lasts for a very short time but today the light lasted for 3 seconds.  I am a young, healthy person and was only midway across the street when it changed.  Many people with health issues and families with children cross here to the hospital clinics.  \u000aAlso, more long-term for this intersection, there should be a light for the parking garage so that cars can turn left out of it.  There should also be another crosswalk on the other side of the parking garage driveway.
p289
aVSidewalk Biking Pedestrian Injury
p290
aVSidewalk The sidewalk before Cliff and Edge Hill Rd. on the Edgerton Park side has many cracks. I think this is in New Haven not Hamden. Some are covered by loose grass.
p291
assI4
(dp292
g2
S'Street Lamps'
p293
sg4
(lp294
VStreet Lamp This street lamp has been out since the overnight electrical work done on 11/2/2014.
p295
aVMultiple Lights out  several lights out between Bradley & Sachem- very dark in this strip. If anyone walks this area maybe they can get pole numbers- sorry I only drive this area.
p296
aVStreet lamp flickering Street lamp goes on and off periodically. 
p297
aVStreet Lamp There are several UI pole with lights out on College Street, across the street from 435 and 451 College Street
p298
aVUnsafe Dark Plaza A female attorney at 157 Church St, leaves work late at night sometimes 9:00pm or later and walks to her apartment at 360 State Street.  walking through the courtyard at the back of the building toward Orange st is is completely dark and at times there are kids hanging out there.  Please keep the lights on later at night
p299
aVStreet Lamp Light is out.
p300
aVStreet lamp out Replace street lamp bulb on pole in front of 1052 Chapel Street
p301
aVStreet Lamp Lights has been out for weeks, reported it twice. 
p302
aVStreet Lamp 
p303
aVStreet Lamp Out Extremely dark stretch of Yale Ave. Light is out
p304
aVStreet Lamp These two lights are out. Can you fix?
p305
aVSpotlights (2) out Replace bulbs for two (2) spotlights on UI 8267
p306
aVlights out light on pole 3144 is out
p307
aVStreet Lamp Light # 25 out on pole # 4009 - on corner of Wall St. & Temple St. 
p308
aVSpotlights (2) out Replace two (2) Spotlight bulbs on N476
p309
aVStreet Lamp the light flickers on and off, mostly off.  This has been happening for about six months now.
p310
aVLow Level Street Lighting Needed On Upper State Street We have a beautiful tree canopy on Upper State Street but unfortunately it makes the busy restaurant corridor very dark at night.\u000a\u000aIt would be really excellent to have a low level street lighting like other commercial districts in the City.
p311
aVPark Light Out This light has not been working since it was installed. It is now the darkest time of the year, and the lack of lighting in the dog park is very dangerous. Please fix this light ASAP. We have been requesting this light to be fixed for several months. Please note that there are two lights on this pole- one light is working, and the other light is NOT working. Please fix the broken light.
p312
aVstreet light out the street light in front of elm city prep is out making greene street very dark!
p313
aVStreet lamp out Pole 2631 in front of 47 S Water. Sound School.
p314
aVStreet lamp,out Replace street lamp bulb on UI 3109
p315
aVStreet lights out Light # 6984 is completely out. Light # 7503 flickers and is out 90% of the time. These are last two lights on View St. across from playground. Intersection of View st and rock is very dark as a result.
p316
aVLights Out Light out on Utility pole 13839
p317
aVlight out second request 
p318
aVStreet Lamp the light is out. It is so dark at night on the SW corner where I live (346 St Ronan) that I can hardly see my feet to walk.
p319
aVLight out for almost a year This light has been reported out multiple times over the last year with nothing done.... The light is STILL out and the neighborhood woke up this morning to a car parked under the light had been robbed... The cars tires and wheels had been stolen and the car was left on milk crates... 
p320
aVStreet Light This light needs replacing. It flickers on and off plunging the block into darkness, for about a week now. New Haven. 
p321
aVlamp out 
p322
aVLamp out at end of Pearl near SOM gate The end of Pearl near the new SOM is deadly dark due to the street light in the short block between Lincoln and Yale being out. Sure hope it will be fixed before Yale swings the gate open.
p323
aVLIGHT OUT LIGHT OUT
p324
aVStreet light Dim The street light on the even side of Lenox - across From Hulse St - is dim often at night.  I have no seen the light at full power at night in a while.
p325
aVStreet Lamp The first, Second, and fourth pole lights are out
p326
aVStreet Lamp is out - customer called in request street lamp is out and it's dark at night
p327
aVstreet lamp not working 
p328
aVStreet lights out There are 14 street lights on these two blocks. 13 are out.
p329
aVStreet light dims, then trys to relight over and over street light across from 346 Alden Ave doesn't stay on, but flickers
p330
aVStreet Lamp These lights have been off for weeks 
p331
aVstreet lamp out street lamp out on corner of ramsdell and fairfield heading toward whalley.
p332
aVParks Request Need brighter lighting in/around green. It's a public safety issue and also a reason no one wants to go through this park at night. They can start with better lighting around the perimeter for visibility and safety. It's especially bad at the bus stops and the lack of visibility encourages bad behavior and makes the bus stops feel unsafe.
p333
aVStreet lamp out Replace street lamp bulb on UI 3199
p334
aVStreet Lamp I have called over 5 times to report this and filled in this form already and it has not been addressed. Our garage was broken into due to the fact that the street corner is dark and the police officer who reported the break in called in the light. PLEASE SOMEONE FIX THE LIGHT. 
p335
aVStreet Lamp Pole lights are out
p336
aVStreet lamp out The lamp is it at the corner of State and Olive. 
p337
aVStreet Lamp Light is out. This area is very dark and we had a homicide her approximately 6 months ago. 
p338
aVseveral Street Lamps: Derby Av, between Yale Av & Blvd Several Street Lamps are out along a section of  Derby Ave/Rte. 34, between Yale Ave & ET Grasso Blvd. As a result, it's VERY dark here at night.
p339
assI5
(dp340
g2
S'Broken Wires & Other Electricity Related Issues'
p341
sg4
(lp342
VPublic Space, Streets and Drains There is a wire hanging from a telephone pole in front of 66-68 Read St. It is hanging across the sidewalk, blocking the driveway of 326 Newhall St. & attached to 326 Newhall St. It looks to be a cable wire. I contacted Comcast 4 times & they either hang up on me or refuse to take the complaint as I am not a customer. It's hanging very low & needs to be removed. Thanks for taking care of it\u000a
p343
aVWires hanging in road from pole & slightly leaning pole There was an accident here in December 2013, and 2 poles were sistered together.  They are not now. Also, there are wires hanging in the road and sidewalk.
p344
aVNO power! NO POWER--Still--Tuesday  3pm--down the street has power--don't see any downed lines or trees!
p345
aVWires hanging across d street from a poles \u000aReported from my mobile device\u000ahttp://m.seeclickfix.com
p346
aVTraffic Signal / Pedestrian Signal wires down in Peck alley behind\u000a201 lombard st.
p347
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Power line hangs low
p348
aVSidewalks and Curb damage There is an electrical wire hanging into the walkway in front of this house. I believe the wire is cold, but nevertheless this should be taken care of ASAP. It is a heavily walked sidewalk and quite annoying to travel into street to avoid getting whipped by the cable. 
p349
aVWire hanging down into street from utility poll 
p350
assI6
(dp351
g2
S'Snow Removal and Snow Related Issues'
p352
sg4
(lp353
VSnow Removal Requested Caller is requesting immediate snow removal at this location (York Street between Broadway and Tower Parkway). Customer are unable to park in front of businesses due to the snow. 
p354
aVPoor plowing All the storms this year.. on Morris Cove road  i have seen only 1 plow truck per storm! We are going to get a ton of flooding! Please we eed to open it up I cannot pull in my driveway
p355
aVSNOW RELATED Orange Street has not been plowed well
p356
aVSNOW RELATED Has not been plowed. Please can we have a plow clear the road?
p357
aVSNOW RELATED There is a huge mountain of snow that is on this area and it is blocking the intersection of n frontage rd. You can't see any incoming cars , should someone run the red light you cannot see anything. In addition the city piled up the snow right on top of the trees what idiot did this. This needs to be addressed.
p358
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains large snow mound makes it difficult to see oncoming traffic as we exit out of the complex.  Directly across from West Prospect Street.
p359
aVSNOW RELATED Until the city plows to the curb, cars will park halfway into the left hand lane. Since the right hand lane is not plowed to the curb either, there is barely one passable travel lane. It's true here, and all across the city. 
p360
aVsnow removal Why can't the public works dept. or the city of new haven issue a no parking ban on the even sides of the streets in the city after they finish doing the odd sides. Many one way or similar side streets in and around Fair Haven that need some serious work on the even sides.Perkins Street and other side streets that are one way have some parking issues due to the fact that not everyone has driveways to park in.
p361
aVSNOW RELATED In front of 296 Elm St (Trail Blazer) there are snow piles and icy banks that are interfering with the parking near the meters. 
p362
aVSNOW RELATED Bus stop impassable - failure to clear snow/sidewalk
p363
aVsnow Living on Clifford Terrace for 40 years and snow removal has always been neglected, to the point that we have paid independent contractors to showel us out.  However, it's unexceptable that Morris Cove hasn't seen a plow since early Friday evening.  Street height of show is 35 inches, and we are unable to leave our homes.  The only thing we can depend on in New Haven is our semi-annual tax bill!!!
p364
aVStreet Not Plowed Resident reports that all of Munson Street is in need of snow plowing. Please send crews to clear the streets. 
p365
aVSNOW RELATED Cars are snowed/plowed in in front of #80, #88 and #160 Parkside Drive and only one car can pass due to vehicles not adhering to the parking ban.
p366
aVAn accident waiting to happen This intersection is so full of snow that almost every car that stops here has trouble going through. Cars slide, wheels spin, I've seen a couple of buses get stuck. . . last night it seemed that even a police cruiser had trouble here. Plows need to come down East Pearl again and get this intersection.
p367
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Despite a one week parking ban, the odd side of the street has not been plowed back to the curb, nor has Edwards been plowed either.  This area does not have zoned parking and therefore the Yale employees use it for daily parking.  Residents need the streets plowed in order to have sufficient parking.
p368
aVSidewalk has not been shoveled Resident reports Hill Regional Career High School has not shoveled sidewalks. Sidewalk needs material. 
p369
aVSNOW RELATED East St/Long Wharf Dr from Water St to Canal Dock has been narrowed from the 4 lanes to 3-3.5.  Hamilton St intersection is narrowed too.
p370
aVSNOW RELATED Clearing of snow and ice on the New Haven Green should be a priority for the pedestrian traffic.  I have been walking on the Green to find huge expanses of icy chunks, making it impassable, and walking is impossible.  This is our urban center, our wonderfully public space, the showpiece of the City, and it should be maintained as such all year round.  I know this winter has been tough.  Thank you.
p371
aVSNOW RELATED The streets are narrow, I hope the city enforces tagging and towing penalty for on odd side  street parking during the next snow storm.
p372
aVSNOW RELATED: street plowin The odd side of the east side of Lyon st. (closest to the interstate) has not been plowed to the curb. It is currently free of cars, and clearing it to the curb will make it much more passable once people start parking on both sides.
p373
aVSNOW RELATED Contractor from Cherry Hill Company plowed snow in street, in the process of cleaning neighboring property
p374
aVSNOW RELATED Right turn lane is entirely blocked by snow, also the right turn lane from Long Wharf to Canal Dock.
p375
aVSNOW RELATED I am a resident on Eldert St, it is very difficult to drive down the street with out slipping and sliding. The plows never came down this street, leaving a lot of snow. The snow is now frozen which is making it very difficult to travel the street. There are plenty of handicap residents on this street. I notice our surrounding streets have been plowed. We need this street plowed.
p376
aVSNOW RELATED Once again the "shopping center" located on the corner of East Pearl & Grand Avenue has failed to do any snow shoveling of the sidewalks bordering their property, forcing pedestrians to walk in the street. This illustrates both the absentee landlord economically exploiting a neighborhood while doing nothing to maintain it and the selective enforcement of New Haven law depending on the neighborhood. I thought that might change somewhat under the new administration, but evidently not.
p377
aVStreet not plowed Anthony Drive is a dead end and for some reason we don't get plowed. a plow came down last night at 7:00 (when there was hardly any snow) and we haven't seen one since. Most people on the street cannot drive down the street because there is too much snow. There are quite a few elderly people living in this neighborhood. 
p378
aVStreet needs snowplowing Pardee Place has not been plowed. Driving is treacherous and it is unsafe for pedestrians as well. Very icy ... needs sanding too.
p379
aVSNOW RELATED Immediate removal of snow required.  Both sides of the street are filled with snow.  Parking is not possible on either side of the street for nine residences.
p380
aVSnow removal Resident reports large snow banks on the intersection of Park St and Chapel St.
p381
aVSidewalks and Curb damage Driveway was damaged by passing plow during winter. Needs inspection.
p382
aVSnow removal Resident reports snow removal is needed on the curbside of Winthrop Ave, Goffe Terrace side. Still no room to park. 
p383
aVplease plow ashmun st please plow ashmun st
p384
aVSNOW RELATED Sidewalk not shoveled, an uneven mess of frozen ice and snow.
p385
aVSNOW RELATED Street need plowing very difficult to get thru!!
p386
aVSNOW RELATED Elderly residence has a blocked sewer and the water is in the driveway, if freezes up difficult to enter driveway.
p387
aVSNOW RELATED Snow bank removal on the lower end of Hobart, terrible needs sand also
p388
aVPlowed in snow at elderly woman home Elderly woman plowed in by plow trucks already had driveway and sidewalks clean and once left city plows, plowed back in. I need someone from the city to plow back out . This is very hazardous for me to be stuck.
p389
aVSNOW RELATED The bridge on court street by state street station is completely unshoveled and it's icy.
p390
aVSNOW RELATED Cars are parked on odd side of street during the emergency parking prohibitions, preventing plows from clearing. Cold Spring has busy rush hour traffic and when plows can't clear to the curb it turns into a one lane road
p391
aVSNOW RELATED Please add Mansion St. to the Florence Ave request. No sand to help with ice.
p392
aVSNOW RELATED Plowing snow in front of driveway at least 2 feet 
p393
aVSNOW RELATED Sidewalk has never been shoveled here. It's a long channel of ice and traveled daily by children and elderly and runners. 
p394
aVSNOW RELATED This is the second complaint I have issued regarding the fact that the owners at 8 stewart street in new haven do not shovel their sidewalk.  I have sent pictures of the property to you and still nothing has been done.  This is two major snow storms now and the corner property is still not shoveled making it unsafe for all the residents of this area.  
p395
aVSNOW RELATED Sidewalk  towards Union station and Police Station underpass\u000ahorrible conditions, snow on sidewalks never been shoveled. Last two weeks completely covered, no salt or snow removal, very active area for pedestrians.  
p396
aVSNOW RELATED HI,\u000a\u000athe Achievement First Amistad High School hasn't had the snow cleared from their side walks since the last snow storm over a week ago, it makes walking their hazardous since you need to walk in the middle of the road.  
p397
aVSNOW RELATED the sidewalk surrounding the garden never seams to be shoveled or sanded after all these snow storms. it's now getting treacherous trying to get to bus stop because of the ice.\u000a
p398
aVNo snow removal... ever? The sidewalk in front of the houses on the river side of Front just before the stop sign at Lewis are, I believe, never shoveled.  At least not this year.  Given that the other sidewalk ends at a triangle, the river-side sidewalk is the one that folks use.  \u000a\u000aThe buildings are occupied.
p399
aVSnow Plow Glen View, Fowler, Green Hill, Lawn Crest , roads were not plowed properly
p400
aVIcy Roads Resident reports that Park Lane is icy and in need of salt and sand. 
p401
assI7
(dp402
g2
S'Policing Issue'
p403
sg4
(lp404
VPolicing Issue - Drug Dealing I'm seeing more and more drug deals in front of the wooded lot between 10 Howard St and 20 Howard St.  It's happening at all times of the day, with the same participants over and over.  Is there someone we can report vehicles/license plates/drivers to?  Posting them here in the past have gotten them deleted by the over zealous SCF admins.  NHPD, please take note.  Thank you.
p405
aVDrug Trafficing Today on Beecher Well know stop for drugs by PD.  Lots of traffic.  3 cars already today.  Please come monitor.
p406
aVPolicing Issue Roosevelts at 754 State St is open after hours again. This is not the first time they've broken the zoning special exemption that they are operating under. As a resident of New Haven and of Bradley St I am asking that the NHPD please send an officer by to investigate their repeated violation of operating hours as well as the multiple illegally parked vehicles of their staff and customers (and excessive noise)
p407
aVDrug dealing on private property Kids in our complex and from Quinnipiac Ave meet customers at the entrance of the complex to serve their customers drugs 
p408
aVBike stolen from home - REWARD OFFERED! Bike stolen from home on Clark Street in East Rock. It's a NS bikes black Surge mountain bike medium, orange handle grips. Picture here. Reward offered. Please post here or contact the New Haven Police Department with information/if found. 
p409
aVOther Got a phone call saying I did not show up for federal jury duty  and I would be arrested unless I come up with $500.
p410
aVkids with paint ball and BB guns There are kids in the area that are always shooting bb and/or paint guns at animals, houses, and other objects. Tonight they are chasing each other and shooting at each other. 
p411
aVPolicing Issue Rosewood Avenue is becoming a popular hangout for the loathsome. Cars parked with people sitting in them at all hours of the night. People hanging out in the street talking with people as they drive up. Stereos blasting obscene music.
p412
aVDope smokers Kids are always seen smoking dope here- please call NHPD and let them know! i am sick of seeing drug use in this city
p413
aVPolicing Issue Do the cops really need to drive their cars on the Green?  I see them frequently doing this. Both yesterday and today during Arts and Ideas they've been patrolling by car. What's that about? What's the message?
p414
aVPrivate Property Issue Resident of Dorman Street called to report that 58 Dorman Street's grass is overgrown and house looks abandoned. Please have someone inspect.
p415
aVPackage Stolen from Porch Several items were stolen out of a package on my porch between 3:30 and 5:30PM on 10/29/14. The perpetrators cut the box open and took only the items that must have appealed to them, leaving an item that they probably realized they couldn't fence. How thoughtful.
p416
aVIllegal parking Parking lot being used for dealing Sundayt night by dark colored pickup truck and blue car.
p417
aVPolicing Issue There has been an huge increase of people driving the wrong way down Court Street. This morning the driver of the one car parked in the one spot on Court Street couldn't be bothered to drive the right direction down the street. Can anything be done to stop dimwits from: 1. blocking the street; and 2. driving the wrong way.
p418
aVDRUG DEALING ALL DAY AND NIGHT CONTINOUSLY There is ongoing drug dealing going on on Beecher Street. The police are very aware of it as there have been multiple arrests at this home. If you live nearby it is time to rid ourselves of this illegal activity. Our neighborhood is too nice to let this keep going. There are children living in the same house. I have walked by on occasion and almost got high on the sidewalk. I have been taking pics and letting the buyers know that I am well aware of their presence. I can't do this alone. The impact on the neighborhood is terrible. Please help me help the police end this. Sgt. Anastasio has asked anyone suspecting a drug deal call him with make, color and plate if he is on duty. In addition the NHPD has asked for all of us to pitch in and call the non-emergency number until we can make them go away. Thanks for your help in advance.
p419
assI8
(dp420
g2
S'Notifications & Announcements'
p421
sg4
(lp422
VNeed suggestions for cycle track  City officials are looking for suggestions on how to split the cycle track around Edgewood Park. See photo of challenge. 
p423
aV(EONP) Crown St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Monday, April 20th on the even side of Crown St, from College St to High St, meter numbers 04505 through 04515, due to utility work.
p424
aV(EONP) ELM ST There will be handicap parking only Sunday & Monday, May 17-18,2015 on Elm St the south side from College St to Temple St for Yale Graduation.
p425
aV(EONP) Norrton Street There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban Thursday August 14th on both sides of 336-338 Norton Street, 100ft in both directions due to water repair.
p426
aV(EONP) Read St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Monday, June 22nd on both sides of 20 Read St, going 150 feet on either side of the house, due to an emergency sewer repair.
p427
aV(EONP) Pine St.  There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Friday May 8th on the even side of 42 Pine St between Clinton Ave and Front St, from utility pole 2131-3133, due to tree trimming.
p428
aV(EONP) Newhall St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Saturday April 11th, on both sides of Newhall St., from Division St to the town line due to street sweeping operations.
p429
aV(EONP) Chatham St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Tuesday May 12th on the even side of Chatham St. between Atwater St. and Rowe St. due to tree trimming.
p430
aV(EONP) Ferry St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Tuesday, May12th on both sides of 613 Ferry St, going 100 Ft in both directions due to the installation of a new water service.
p431
aV(EONP) Ferry St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Wednesday, June 24th on the even side of Ferry St., from house number 460-464, between Grafton St. and Pine St., from UI pole # 733-130, due to tree work.
p432
aV(EONP) Chambers St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on  Monday, April 27th on the odd side of 65 Chambers St, going 150 Ft, due to tree work.
p433
aV(EONP) DAVENPORT AVE   There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Thursday, May 7th at 110 Davenport Ave - meter numbers 45101, 45103, 45105, & 45106 for sidewalk repair.
p434
aV(EONP) Front St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Thursday, May 21st on the odd side of Front St., between Grand Ave and Exchange St. due to tree trimming. 
p435
aVPollution in the West River--Workshop #2 Join Save the Sound and the West River Watershed Coalition for a workshop focused on water quality in the West River.\u000a\u000aWEDNESDAY, MAY 27th from 6:30-8:30pm at the Barnard Nature Center in West River Memorial Park. Entrance on Derby Ave, west of intersection of Derby and Ella T. Grasso Blvd.\u000aRegister here: http://events.constantcontact.com/register/event?llr=vpnrezcab&oeidk=a07eaykoo7ge23b83a6\u000a\u000aTake advantage of this opportunity to learn about the West River Watershed Plan (in progress) and contribute to the plan by helping us develop recommendations for restoring the West River and its watershed.\u000a\u000aThe West River runs 25 miles from Bethany, CT to New Haven Harbor. While the river is only 25 miles long, the West River Watershed covers over 34 square miles of land--including parts of Hamden, Woodbridge, New Haven and West Haven--all of which drains to the river over land or through its many tributaries.\u000a\u000aIf you live in, work in, or just enjoy the West River and its tributaries--join us!\u000a\u000aBE A PART OF THE SOLUTION!\u000a\u000aFree and open to all. Register here: http://events.constantcontact.com/register/event?llr=vpnrezcab&oeidk=a07eaykoo7ge23b83a6\u000a\u000aContact kbarbery@savethesound.org with questions.
p436
aV(EONP) Mechanic St. There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Wednesday, June 24th on the even side of Mechanic St, from house number 86 to the corner of Eagle St., due to sidewalk repairs.
p437
aVParking Notice Signs Torn/Blown down There are a number of Parking Notice signs that were put up to remind residents that there will be a street sweeping team by in the morning, and unfortunately all of the signs along Academy street have either been blown down or torn down.  \u000a\u000aIf you are parked along Academy street, please move your vehicles so you don't get towed!  
p438
aV(EONP) Orange St.  There will be an Emergency Order No Parking ban on Wednesday,April 1st  on the odd side of 71 Orange St, from meter numbers 05210 through 05202 due to utility work for U.I.
p439
aVExtremely dangerous railroad crossing for cyclists Be very careful crossing the tracks on your bike. Go slow and cross perpendicular to the rails.  Signage is desperately needed.  See http://groups.yahoo.com/group/elmcitycycling/message/8023
p440
assI9
(dp441
g2
S'General Bitches'
p442
sg4
(lp443
VBoardwalk still not repaired two years later Boardwalk still not repaired two years after storm. Willful disregard of public right to access to water.
p444
aVTraffic and Parking processing payments in Milwaukee I tried to pay a parking ticket online and they wanted to charge me a "convenience fee of 10%.  That is absurd so I decided to mail my payment.\u000aThe mailing address is in Milwaukee WI, not New Haven CT.  Why can't the city employ city residents to process these things?  They are taking city resident's money and paying people in Milwaukee!  So much for keeping jobs in New Haven!
p445
aVPrivate Property Issue Severe blight, private property with dangerous structural rot, broken windows, doors, etc. Neighbors have made reports to LCI in the past several years. No corrective action taken. Because of the broken windows, this summer and fall neighbors complained about individuals entering home on beach side and Townsend Ave. No action taken. Vacant property poses risk to surrounding homes, building collapse and fire. Why doesn't LCI hold the property owner responsible?\u000a
p446
aVPotholes Car accident due to large pothole on Willow between Orange and Whitney Ave.
p447
aVProstitution in Beaver Hill I just witnessed a prostitute soliciting a man visiting a neighbor across the street. This aberrant behavior is not going to be tolerated here. From now on, I will walk outside and take pictures of these incredibly ignorant women.  And ignorant is the correct word here, as when the gentleman refused her "advances," she erupted into some of the most disgusting trash talk I have ever heard come out of someone's mouth. I cannot even post it here, that is how sick this prostitute was with her words.\u000a\u000aWhere is our new alderperson on this issue? I bet she considers crack whores in the hood a non-issue.
p448
aVUtility digging up road  A utility company will be digging up the road @ # 216 prindle ave. What ever happened to the 5 year moratorium on digging up newly paved streets ?
p449
aVParks Request Edgewood ave mall grass has not been mowed at the sidewalk. Where is the parks department? Why don't they acknowledge this negligence?
p450
aVOther - city responsibility The bridge on East Rock Rd. that crosses the Mill River and connects with English Dr. is still not passable. I do not understand how this bridge is on schedule work wise.
p451
aVPW CALL VERSUS POSTING OF STREET SWEEPING The robo-call came in today to move cars for street sweeping tomorrow in East Rock area.  Usually the south side of Trumbull St gets swept on Tuesday and the signs are up by now.  There are signs on the north side of Trumbull St only.  Will they post for Tuesday?  Will the south side get swept?  It needs it.
p452
aVOther - city responsibility I was up by the East Rock Rd. bridge and it was being worked on but it still is not passable.  WHY is this Still being worked on???
p453
aVPolicing Issue This is a serious message: the men who walk around this town with their pants hanging down below their rear ends should be FINED. This style statement comes from PRISON. And I believe what goes on in a PRISON should STAY in a PRISON. 
p454
assI10
(dp455
g2
S'Illegal Dumping & Garbage Related'
p456
sg4
(lp457
VIllegal Dumping People move out of house and leave all old furniture on lawn
p458
aVIllegal Dumping television
p459
aVIllegal Dumping Resident reports illegally dumped items in front of this address. The pile of items has been at the curbside for more than 2 months. Please have the items removed as soon as possible.
p460
aVTrash & Recycling Trash Never picked up- put on curb Wednesday night Need trash picked up Have no more space in cans to add more trash   Thank You Joyce Chapman
p461
aVIllegal Dumping Pile of garbage dumped.
p462
aVTrash & Recycling My bin was at the curb this morning (3/5/15) at the correct time. Neighbors on both sides and across the street had theirs picked up -- mine was skipped over, though it was in plain sight. I doubt anything can be done about it now, but I'd like this not to happen again. If a pick up can be arranged for tomorrow, please leave me a message at 203-466-9896
p463
aVPlease plow Sherland ave Please plow southern block of  Sherland between east grand and Howard (?) to allow for street parking.
p464
aVRecycling Missed  Resident reports that recycling was not collected at this location. 
p465
aVLITTER IN FRONT OF SCHOOL 
p466
aVTrash & Recycling The toters are being left at the curb site again.  This issue was \u000aoutstanding for almost a year and was finally addressed and closed.  Please re-open.
p467
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains The truck that picks up the trash weekly is discarding broken glass all the way down the street, at pick up stops, causing issues for drivers & residents. This has been an issue for several weeks 
p468
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Neighbor is blowing leaves in street causing an issue with street sweeping!!  Happen often needs to be address not fair to neighbors!!
p469
aVTrash in public space House number 405. Large trash items have been sitting off the curb for several months.
p470
aVGarbage truck dropping glass/flat tire There is glass throughout the entire street as a result of the garbage truck  dropping a mix of trash with glass.  My car just got a flat tire as a result of this.  Please have someone clean up.  There are many kids in our neighborhood play basket ball out here and ride their bikes on the street. 
p471
aVLarge TV Dumped There is a large TV dumped on Bleake near the corner of Osborn Ave, that has STILL not been removed.  It is now broken in pieces and the children who walk there to their bus, could get injured by the sharp pieces lying in their path.  Please remove this item IMMEDIATELY.
p472
aVLoud Trash & Recycling pick up at 4:30 am There was trash and recycling pick up at 5:45 am on Thursday and 4:25 am on Friday.  This issue had been resolved previously, but the issue has started up again.  Obviously the pick up company isn't listening to the messages that have been sent to them.  Some action needs to be taken.
p473
aVIllegal Dumping 54 edgewood ave moved out yesterday. i walked by, saw them leave pointless bookshelves with no shelves on them, a crappy old desk and other pieces, and just leave it on the sidewalk. walked by later and saw them leave. junk is still there. 
p474
aVIllegal Dumping Old TV and broken furniture dumped at end of Chapel street, on right side heading down towards Front Street. This has been there all winter. Please pick up!!
p475
aVIllegal Dumping-  excessive litter Excessive litter on Quinnipiac Ave is a huge eye sore and also an environmental concern.  A LOT of trash that has been thrown over the years from passing vehicles.  The worst areas is near the train overpass.  Even DPW or NH Police barricades are among the trash strewn about the roadside.  The items need to be picked up and I suggest place a sign reminding travelers about unlawful littering and potential fines.  It appears the drains are blocked with trash.
p476
aVParks Request - please develop a regular trash pick up schedule of at least every other day for trash in Wooster Square Park. Trash in Wooster Square Park
p477
aVclean up trash,overgrown weeds,garbage in wetlands.
p478
aVTRASH BULK PICK UP The recycle bin that belongs to 35 HIlltop Road was not pick up on MOnday. I am reported this problem because this has laso happened to me SEVERAL TIMES. I did report it to the City of New Haven. I spoke with one of the men who work on the truck and he states that he cannot see them. The regular trah pick NEVER NEVER NEVER has left out our trah cans. The problem also is that we lib=ne our trah cans and recycle bins in FRONT of my house nad I donot want them staying there ALL WEEK ONG because they cannot look over to the right and see these BIG BRIGHT BLUE CANS.  We live in a culdesac and evrything is in eye view.  WE are really getting VERY TIRED of this.
p479
aVDiscourtesy Resident observed refusemen emptying the contents of the brown trash toter into the blue recycling toter. As a result of this, the recycling crew refused to collect the weekly recycling. Please investigate and address this matter immediately 
p480
aVOne side of street swept only... From blatchley ave to front st .. Only one side was swept last week , the other side of all streets were not , we only get sweeping once a month , and all the litter piled up .. \u000a\u000aThanks 
p481
aVTrash & Recycling Property is using recycling as trash. Bins were not collected.
p482
aVTrash & Recycling Resident has neighbors that are dumping trash into their dumpster and it overflows onto the street and on the sidewalk. 
p483
aVLoud Trash/recycling pick up at 4:40am Trash/recycling pick up happened at 4:40am this morning.  This is in violation of the noise ordinance.  This had been going on for several weeks now. 
p484
aVCouch dumped in Edgewood Park Brown couch placed in woods at corner of West Rock and Yale Avenues, on Yale Avenue. 
p485
aVIllegal Dumping We did a cleanup on Main Street this morning. There is a couch and several bags of trash. Please remove. 
p486
aVIllegal Dumping Illegal dumping in the alley way on Clinton place, next to the given address. \u000aCase# 15-019385
p487
aVBins for Trash & Recycling Need bins for trash collection.
p488
aVTrash & Recycling Extra trash bins are required due to the bus stop located at this corner! People on and off the bus cannot seem to walk to the front of the store where the bin is located! Please keep this corner clean with extra trash bins at the bus stop!
p489
aVTrash & Recycling Trash out for weeks
p490
aVBins for Trash & Recycling Refuse did not properly replace toter in front of property always constant
p491
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Street sweeping has not occurred on Clark Street, lots of trash!!\u000a 
p492
aVDumping snow into the street Resident is illegally dumping snow from private property into street. 
p493
aVTrash Not Collected  Resident reports that trash was not collected at this location during weekly pick-up. 
p494
aVCity Trash Barrells City Trash barrels on Orange, Court street has been removed would like to know why?  Trash is now being thrown in the street
p495
aVBins for Trash & Recycling Voice message left at DPW. Three family home but only 1 brown and 1 blue toter.\u000a3 family home
p496
aVRecycling Not Collected Consistently Resident reports a that recycling is not being consistently collected by the recycling crew. Please address this matter. 
p497
aVTrash & Recycling Christmas tree pick up was put straight into the garbage truck along with regular house hold trash.  I thought christmas trees were composed????  
p498
aVTrash & Recycling Recycling toter badly damaged has called 6 weeks ago 
p499
aVIllegal Dumping There is a box spring someone left on the side of the road on Chambers, just below East Pearl.
p500
aVIllegal Dumping Illegal dumping at residence.
p501
aVTrash & Recycling Blue recycling is constantly overflowing with regular trash and is left out in front of property constantly
p502
aVTrash & Recycling People parking in the entrance of the 2nd Court making it impossible for recycling to pickup to to snow in the entrance also.
p503
aVRecycling Bin Request  
p504
aVTrash & Recycling As I passed this spot, workers with Trash Master of East Haven had started the crushing mechanism on their truck and a foul-smelling liquid cascaded from it, all over the street. I asked who would be cleaning that up and one of the men muttered the word "water." Upon passing the same spot 40 minutes later, the liquid was still there, stinking to high heaven.  Shouldn't the company be liable for cleaning spilled garbage on a public street?
p505
aVTrash & Recycling Garbage and recycling is all over lawn and street. All bins are full and recycling men do not pick it up. 
p506
aVOther last year I put leaves into clear plastic bags and they were picked up .I now have them out agian and they were not taken......Why? If I take them to the transfer station can i leave them in the plastic?
p507
aVOther  resident complaining about trash from bulk being placed in front of their residence and it is also being dumped illegally. 
p508
aVCans at Curb All Week  Neighbors report that the residents of 65 Bristol Street keep their trash toters at the curbside all week long. They are not brought back on to the property after weekly trash and recycling collection. Please send someone to this location to investigate. 
p509
aVStreet Sweeping There's trash left in the middle of the street.
p510
aVIllegal Dumping on railroad property near gate large speaker and bags
p511
aVMatress  Matress dumped on Hallock Ave sidewalk. At the intersection of Hallock & 3rd St.
p512
aVTrash & Recycling Just removed trash bags did not  empty trash toters,  One of the crew members was inappropriate when question regarding trash pic up
p513
aVTrash & Recycling The first house on the right, Possibly 15 leaves their trash cans lying on the ground. There are cans and garbage bags on the curb. It's real trashy looking. 
p514
aVYard Waste Not Collected  Resident reports that yard waste was not collected at this location. 
p515
aVPrivate Property Issue Trash been in back yard for over a year .... saw rats out ther the other day ...massive  junk just duped there .
p516
aVBins for Trash & Recycling Toter was taken from the community garden at the given address.
p517
aVWeed Wacking and mowing The intersection of Bank St and Harper Ave is very overgrown with weeds/grass. This invites even more illegal dumping than already seen here. Just had public works remove all the debris. Please mow/weed wack before debris returns.
p518
aVOther - city responsibility Leaves not picked up from residence 
p519
aVIllegal Dumping On Russell Street  on the right side before going north about 100 yards before Highview Lane there are about four hypodermic needles in the street. I reported this to the police. Hopefully they are removed before a child gets a hold of them.    
p520
aVRecycling Missed Resident reports that recycling was not collected today. Please send someone to this address as soon as possible.
p521
aVTrash in Board of Education and Merchant parking lot The parking lot on the corner of East Pearl street and grand avenue is full of garbage it needs to be cleaned up
p522
aVLeaf Bags Resident reports that her leaf bags did not get picked up. 
p523
aVGarbage piled in front yard Garbage bags, loose litter, paint can dumped in front yard. 
p524
aVno trash can available I live in a three family home. Eight people live here. We were given two garbage cans a few years ago. One blew away or disappeared on garbage pick up day in March. Since March no amount of visiting, or calling the Public Works Department In New Haven has succeeded in getting a replacement garbage can. My garbage over flows every week. It is disgusting with flies and animal life benefiting. I am at a loss as to why they can not provide a garbage can for each apartment. 
p525
aVTrash & Recycling recycling containers have NOT been picked up today\u000aon the east side of the 300 fountain st. block!!!
p526
aVTrash & Recycling not collected Resident reports trash and recycling was not picked up Friday morning. 
p527
assI11
(dp528
g2
S'Motorcycles Being Super Annoying'
p529
sg4
(lp530
VATV Ripping Up Grass of Edgewood Mall At 4:40pm on Wednesday, April 8, there is currently a rider of a four-wheeled blue ATV who is doing repeated donuts, ripping up the grass in the mall on Edgewood Avenue. \u000a\u000aMy son believes this is the same ATV that we saw riding in Edgewood Park (even going into the Skate Park) on Sunday afternoon. The driver had a young child on his lap as they raced through the park.
p531
aVTraffic/Road Safety There is a lime green Ford Mustang with modified muffler/exhaust system that has been racing around Westville for several weeks now.  The driver has been racing up and down Central Avenue at all hours of the day and into the night.\u000a\u000aThe driver consistently speeds through Westville at 40+ mph, ignores stop signs and makes unnecessary noise with the modified exhaust muffler system.  The dangerous driving is a threat to pedestrians and other drivers as well as being a significant quality of life disruption.  \u000a\u000aI usually see the car on Central Avenue, but I have observed the car on Edgewood Avenue and on Whalley Avenue as well. \u000a\u000aGiven the speed and unpredictability, I have not been able to get a license plate number. Any help from New Haven police, or other Westville residents would be greatly appreciated. 
p532
aVMotorcycle noise levels Motorcycles accelerating onto/exiting from the I-91 ramp have noise levels well in excess of limits required by state law.
p533
aVCurb damage Resident reports that there is no curbing in front of this address. When it rains, water floods onto the property causing damage. 
p534
aVMultiple quads and dirtbikes flying around this are right now Police were called. Please take photos and add them here if you can get photos of the riders. 
p535
aVInsufficiently muffled vehicles  We were pleased to read in the Register  that the NHPD is taking this quality of life issue seriously. We hope they will keep an eye (or perhaps ear) on Townsend Ave, where we continue to have under-muffled motorcycles, dirtbikes, and ATVs round the clock. 
p536
aVPolicing Issue There are at least 3 scooters or small motorcycles riding up and down the closed portion of English Drive.  Runners, walkers and cyclists do not expect motorized vehicles, and they are a danger to those using the road legally (in particular children whose parents are not expecting motorized traffic).  
p537
aVPolicing Issue The illegal bikes are officially back! I'm sincerely fed up with the lack of police presence on our street. Nice to know that Morris Cove is once again forgotten about. Two male bikers on dirt bikes just screamed past my house, makeshift face masks in place. We know the police are aware of it. Get better at corralling them or the neighborhood will find a way to do it for you.
p538
aVTraffic/Road Safety Last night, Friday, the 25th;  at 9:30-10:00PM, there was a large ATV being driven around Florence to Townsend, to Parker, to Mansion and then driving into the large driveway between the two houses on Florence, at the end of Mansion.  They made many of these passes at a high rate of speed, and a great deal of noise..  The vehicle is housed at one of the two residences.  I called and reported it, but never saw a police car come by.  Please gat a handle on this right away
p539
assI12
(dp540
g2
S'General Public Property Damage and Repair'
p541
sg4
(lp542
VParking Meter Meter out of order. 
p543
aVCheap aluminum fence is collapsing Wintergreen Apartments
p544
aVNO STANDING SIGNS AROUND CHATHAM SQUARE PARK FADED All of the No Standing Signs on Clinton Ave. Chatham Street, Maltby Street, Grafton Street Faded, are not readable FOR YEARS, & YEARS AROUND THE CHATHAM SQUARE PARK.\u000a\u000aCALLED & PUT REQUEST ABOUT 2 WEEKS AGO, STILL NOTHING DONE.
p545
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings Entire Bus Shelter Toppled Over
p546
aVDANGEREOUS! FIX A FENCE. Failing riverwall and walkway along Q-River close to Ferry St. Bridge.  Temporary safety fencing has been compromised. There is several hundred yards of the seawall reinforcing the west shore of the Quinnipiac River north of Ferry St. bridge.  It is a popular walk along the river as well as popular fishing spot.  Part of that structure in a direct vicinity of Ferry St bridge has failed few years ago and it is getting worse. Last year the area was fenced as it is dangerous - the fence has been compromised and requires some attention.  It will be a band-aid solution but I understand and hope that the seawall problem will be addressed permanently as a part of the River Street Project,.
p547
aVContinuous beeping crosswalk sign I am at 310 prospect street and I can hear a constant beeping of the crosswalk sign on the right side up the street up from our building. Something is wrong with it. It should not be beeping continously!
p548
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Broken sign\u000a\u000aSomebody drove their car into this a few weeks ago. On Ellsworth at maple
p549
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings "No Parking" street signed knocked down in front of address. Resident looking to have it repaired. 
p550
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings Street sign on the pole at the corner of Kneeland Road and Upson Terrace has fallen off. It is on the ground next to the pole. Please replace
p551
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings Sign is disconnected from bolts. Looks like it will fly away
p552
assI13
(dp553
g2
S'Other/Unclear'
p554
sg4
(lp555
VPrivate Property Issue 
p556
aVmail delivery do not receive mail on a regular basis for weeks This is a three  family home that only has mail delivery 3 days a week for  last several  months\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000aWe are not receiving mail on a daily basis. This is a three family home  that only gets mail hopefully  4 days a week and usually after 8 PM  Does our mail carrier have a day job?\u000a\u000a\u000a
p557
aVThe rebuilt bridge from Farnham to East Rock Drive This new bridge looks terrific -- design and construction just right for this area. The iron arches supporting the bridge, the nice railings, and the stone abutments at each end are terrific bookends to this small structure.\u000aCould we get an update from the city about when this bridge will be reopened? thanks
p558
aVPot holes  From James & Lombard all the way up to Humphrey & east. Holy potholes... Now way to.avoid them..m....
p559
aVFEMA Flood Certificate Did anyone do an elevation certificate in the area and use a land surveyor?  Apparently its cheaper to use the land surveyor who has done one nearby...or share the costs with neighbors.  Everyone in AE who hasn't done one is going to have to.  Thoughts?
p560
aVHanging Christmas decoration snow flake  String on Claire's cornucopia broke off and could potentially be a law suite to city if the string on the Taft building breaks off as well! 
p561
aVarchway light green neon keeps flashing
p562
aVInsecure Signage large 5'x15' banner not securely fastened and could fall on someone.  
p563
aVstreet signs needed Brand new developement with street signs missing in various locations of the property.
p564
aVTall Grass in City Right of way Across from the School is a City Right   of way that needs to be cut back.\u000a\u000a\u000aPlease cut grass.\u000a\u000a\u000a( There is a block party this weekend).
p565
aVWhen is construction on the Canal Trail supposed to be started here? We were curious when this plan was supposed to start coming to fruition. Excited to see it happen. \u000a\u000ahttp://www.newhavenindependent.org/index.php/archives/entry/permission_granted_to_reach_the_sea/
p566
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Abandoned bicycle in Edgewood park near corner of Yale and west Elm sts
p567
aVsnow plow hit my vehicle A city snow plow hit my parked vehicle on 2/10/2015 @around 0230. I called the police who,arrived to make a report the officer also had plow number 72 return to the scene for his information. Please contact me Tracy Cannon @2034792982 tracycannon215@gmail.com in regards to my vehicles damage
p568
aVOther - city responsibility Loose panels at Edgewood School
p569
aVremoval Chapel West Inspection
p570
aVPrivate Property Issue There is a fence that separates my home from a condo association behind me. The fence has been decaying over the years and is now gone in some places. This has resulted in people walking through my property from there condo to get to the local synagogue or a short cut to the street. The fence is also gone near the condo trash area, resulting in garbage on my lawn. I have a dog. I have spoken to several people with whom i thought to be associated with the condo but nothing has been done. 
p571
aVPotholes Gas line cap is immovable and upside down
p572
aVstump storm 10/25/14\u000a21 Cora Street (rear) via Lighthouse Park 
p573
aVTRUNK 
p574
assI14
(dp575
g2
S'Traffic & Road Safety'
p576
sg4
(lp577
VWhitney Ave only 1.25 lanes Why is it Hamden can plow two full lanes yet New haven can barely got one and a half. Every year. PUSH IT BACK PLEASE. Traffic was and is backed up to Hamden line due to ineffective plowing- 
p578
aVTraffic/Road Safety Ashmun/henry ST. there is a 3 way stop.  There is a stop sign along with a blinking red light.  Cars drive right through it, they don't even slow down.  this happens all day.  The police do park and pull cars.  I was on my porch Sunday for 20 minutes and watched over 15 cars go right through it.  There is a bus stop right there.  I'm not sure what can be done to stop this before somebody gets hurt.
p579
aVcell phones i see a lot of people on the cell\u000aphones when they are driving
p580
aVTiming Off The light on Bassett Street at Shelton Avenue is unbelievably slow. When there's no traffic coming either direction on Shelton and I find myself waiting at the light for 2-3 minutes, I become frustrated.
p581
aVOngoing Traffic Violations Vehicles are always dropping off, standing and parked in front of the Knight of Columbus building on Church Street. Police need to patrol the area a bit more especially around heavy traffic times.
p582
aVNo Turn on Red sign hidden The new traffic light pole at the intersection of Park and South Frontage has obscured the "No Turn on Red" sign on South Frontage.  \u000a\u000aThe sign should be moved to a visible location, or raised to the level of the traffic lights, like the other ones.  People turn right on red willy-nilly from South Frontage to Park, despite the crosswalk there.  \u000a\u000aIt was not this bad before the new traffic poles went up.
p583
aVAbandoned Newspaper box My neighbor on Bishop St says this abandoned box blocks her line of sight when making the turn from Bishop onto Whitney. 
p584
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Wide shoulder being used to pass lines of waiting traffic on the right.  Dangerous for cyclists and drivers going around  traffic turning left onto Blake St.  Needs barriers or better lane/shoulder marking.
p585
aVNo Turn on Red Can I make a suggestion?  Can we eliminate the No Turn on Red sign on the corner of State and Edwards? I understood the need for it back when you could actually take State Street all the way through.  However, that road under the overpass has been closed for what two or three years now.  There is minimal traffic and the light is SO LONG while waiting on Edwards.  
p586
aVTraffic/Road Safety EXCESSIVE SPEEDING here all the time! I've noticed cars travelling way over the speed limit here on Livingston Street. The wide, straight two-lane road only encourages such behavior. I've never seem any NHPD traffic enforcement here. Targeted enforcement and some re-engineering work (speed bumps, maybe parked cars, or other traffic calming measures) is sorely needed here to slow drivers down. There are alot of pedestrians walking around.
p587
aVImpossible left turn It is impossible to turn left onto forest road coming from Edgewood Ave due to the oncoming traffic and a left turn signal should be added
p588
aVGeneral Bus Request/Incident Bus at 6:10 pm. 6/29/15 heading down concord to Townsend ave. must have been doing at least 45 mph in a 25mph zone , needs to slow down before it kills someone!!!!!!!!!
p589
aVSpeeding this is supposed to be a 25 mile zone because of a school.sign is right in front of my house ,yet speeders every day!! should have more police radars set up
p590
aVBad timing on traffic signal The traffic light at the entrance to the Hooker middle school should not turn red every minute on the weekends.  It creates excessive traffic on Whitney Avenue at a time when there is zero or incredibly little traffic merging onto Whitney from either Huntington or the school.  Please change the signal so that it only changes when a vehicle is waiting to turn, or make the light a blinking red/yellow on the weekends.
p591
aVWrong way drivers  Please post a wrong way sign and/or do something about the drivera going the wrong way on East Pearl towards Grand Ave.\u000aI witness a child almost hit by a car that was traveling the wrong way, as I drive on my way from work I travel through here and I always encounter wrong way drivers.
p592
aVOther - city employee in city vehicle disregarding stop sign and speeding Hi, I recently moved to New Haven in August and live in the East Rock neighborhood. I learned quickly that being a pedestrian or cyclist in New Haven comes with potential peril and consequently have adapted my behaviors to be extra cautious when crossing the street. While it is frustrating to witness multiple times on a daily basis blatant disregard for basic traffic laws by citizens, I am especially alarmed when I witness City employees (presumably) in City vehicles driving in such a way. Today at 4pm as I approached the crosswalk of Nicoll and Lawrence, a City Park and Rec light green Ford Escape approached the intersection from the southeast and quite literally blew through the intersection and made a right turn onto Nicoll. This was done while accelerating and without any consideration for the stop sign nor pedestrian safety. The vehicle entered the opposing lane of traffic as it sped down Nicoll at a speed obviously greater than the speed limit. Again, this happened as I was about to enter the crosswalk and I cannot provide a description of the driver bc the vehicle was moving just that fast. I don't want to sound like a curmudgeon, as I'm in my 30s, but having been an employee of state and federal gov't in the past, and being an overall concerned citizen for  the pedestrians in New Haven (i.e. two pedestrians were killed just LAST week), I think this issue should be brought to the attention of the Park and Rec Dept and the driver should be reminded of his/her responsibility to only not injure pedestrians, but to represent the gov't and city with a better image than he/she did. Thank you.
p593
aVTraffic light not changing  The traffic light is permanently green for traffic exiting I-95, and is not changing.
p594
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings Obstructed speed / children at play sign.  Reported by Alderwoman Santana.
p595
aVCan we get a STOP sign, please? I've lived near the intersection of Mechanic and Lawrence for over a year now and now feel confident enough in my observations to bring up the need for a stop sign for east going traffic at the intersection of Mechanic and Lawrence. This is a highly used crosswalk for residents in East Rock as they walk to and from the businesses on State Street. At times, crossing the street feels like playing Russian Roulette (e.g. anytime at night and especially at afternoon rush hour).  Both other directions at this intersection require have a stop sign yet east traveling traffic does not. Yet, the cars that have the highest potential speed are the one ones traveling east on Lawrence as drivers have two unimpeded blocks to gain speed. I've noticed that cars often enter the right turn from Lawrence at a higher than safe speed. With customers exiting The Pantry and Mezcal often, I've noticed several near collisions between pedestrians and cars. Like I said, I'm just astonished that this intersection does not have a stop sign for east bound Lawrence traffic. 
p596
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings There is no street sign at the junction of Orchard Place and Orchard Street that displays Orchard Place.\u000a\u000aVery frustrating, been missing for a very long time  
p597
aVNo-Turn on Red sign replaced. The city has put in new stop lights at this intersection which is great, but you have removed the No Turn on Red sign. It is EXTREMELY difficult to see when turning from Emerson to Whalley due to the fact the white line is placed far back and some residential shrubs block the view of oncoming traffic. PLEASE replace this sign to help keep residents safe while turning.  I have witnessed many near misses at this intersection from people turning not being able to see oncoming traffic.
p598
aVNo Speed Limit Signs on Mitchell Dr at Willow St Notice on a walk the other day there are no posted speed limit signs from the beginning of Mitchell Dr (at the intersection with Willow St) until at least Anderson Street. Gives even more license for folks to speed when coming from or going to the highway. \u000a\u000a
p599
aVVery Dangerous Curve needs Stop Sign This is a very dangerous curve located at the intersection of 420 Lighthouse Rd New Haven (Morris Cove), CT and Marion St. New Haven(Morris Cove), Ct.\u000a\u000aThis is a main road to get to Lighthouse Point Park and people unfamiliar with the area as well as people from the area speed around the curve.  Almost every time a car comes out of 420 Lighthouse rd it is almost hit by a car coming around the bend.  There is a Blind driveway sign posted right before the curve but is ignored.   There is a park where children play and have to cross this area of the road to get to the park.  Children are in grave danger here.  We do not want another child hit by a vehicle in the city!   A stop sign where the blind driveway sign is posted would be much appreciated by all in this area for the safety of all.
p600
aVTraffic/Road Safety Driving south on Mansfield Street it is impossible to see the STOP SIGN at the intersection with Starr Street until you are right at the corner, due to vegetation that is obstructing the view of the sign. This is not safe!!!\u000a\u000aNOTE on 8-27-14:  Not sure why this issue, relatively easy to resolve (trim the vegetation or raise or lower the stop sign as needed) is still outstanding at 60+ days. It is a safety issue, as noted above, so it needs to be taken care of!!!!
p601
aVTraffic/Road Safety At the intersection of Osborn and Blake St a lot of people fail to properly use the stop signs. I can sit all day at that intersection and count the countless cars that just drive right through them. 
p602
aVTraffic Light not being obeyed There is a traffic light here when you turn right onto Goffe from Webster.  The sign clearly says "No turn on Red".  This makes sense, this is located very near to a local park and elementary school.  Yet, many people don't seem to know or care that this is a red light and treat it instead as a stop sign or a yield sign.  I have been stopped at this light many times and been honked at by other drivers who want me to run the light, or sometimes they just go around, to the point where I now stick to the right half of the lane even though this is a single lane.  The signs need to be made more clear and a police presence needs to be here to discourage those who would violate this traffic light.  It's only a matter of time before someone, perhaps a student at the school, gets hurt by a speeding maniac!
p603
aVTraffic/Road Safety 3 lanes on George Street merge into 2 on Fair Street. The left 2 lanes from George, when it was originally 4 lanes flowed well into Fair Street. Now, that the left lane has been changed to go the opposite direction, the new left lane follows onto Fair Street fine. With the sidewalk and curb on the Knights of Columbus museum still in the same place, the center lane now leads you into the curb. Please fix this or only allow the center and right lanes to only turn right as they previously did. This is a problem, where the previous far left lane allowed for cars to turn left without holding up traffic going straight onto Fair Street or creating an unnatural lane shift. THIS PROBLEM WILL ONLY GET WORSE WITH SCHOOL IN THE FALL AS HSC AND METRO BUSSES AND CT TRANSIT ALL USE THIS CUT THRU ROUTE TO SCHOOL!
p604
aVTraffic/Road Safety Cars driving excessively fast. Exceeding 50 mph is 25 mph residential zone. 
p605
aVTraffic/Road Safety Speeding vehicles 
p606
aVSmilow Cancer Ctr needs curb bump-in due to standing and parking  in moving traffic lane Hi, not sure why no curb bump-in for drop-offs and deliveries was made here at this busy block where 2 lanes of cars turn left onto Frontage from Park St. One block ahead there is a pull-over area, yet none here where there are multiple pedestrian entrances to the Yale Smilow Cancer Ctr, There is frequently now a car stopped dead in the left-most lane, causing traffic back-ups and infuriated drivers who have to go around the car or cars stopped dead. I don;t think it says No Standing, because who would think to stop their car here, in a travel lane? Well, a lot of people, apparently. Something needs to be done to keep traffic moving here.
p607
aVLight timing The timing of this light is off , when coming down Springside Ave onto Blake St.  someone has to take a left from Blake onto Springside Ave to trip the timer. If you're taking a left  onto Blake St you can sit there fo close to seven minutes. People have been running the light.
p608
aVParking Violation/Abandoned Auto There is a 15 yard dumpster parked in in the street in front of 49 Atwater street. The odd side of Atwater for that whole block is no parking. The dumpster is obstructing traffic.
p609
aV5pm Traffic Jams at Front and Grand Happens every day, Mr. Travers.  Traffic lights in all directions turn red when the bridge swings open.\u000a\u000aCars, trucks, and yes, CT busses, regularly swing out of line, drive down LEFT lanes, and turn left -- or right! -- in front of other vehicles.  Drivers crowd onto the bridge's onramp and block traffic to beat others in crossing the bridge when it reopens.  Lots of horns, lots of yelling, lots of anger, lots of everything that happens when  traffic control doesn't make sense and traffic enforcement is absent.\u000a\u000aCan you do something about this, please?  Can we get enforcement here to direct traffic in the short term -- while your office figures out a better way to control the lights?\u000a\u000aThanks!
p610
aVMultiple green lights confusing At the Willow St highway entrance ramp, there are two lanes, a left turn lane and a straight lane. The left turn lane has a normal traffic signal with red light, yellow light, green arrow. Next to that there's a sign indicating "LEFT TURN SIGNAL". In the straight lane, there's 2 green lights. There's no need for 2 lights in the straight lane, and it's clearly confusing for drivers. Drivers often turn left on red here instead of waiting for the left turn signal to turn green, and when waiting for the signal to turn green, I've been honked at and occasionally passed on the right by cars eager to turn left on red.\u000a\u000aIf you remove the middle light on the poles, it might be more clear that the green light is for the right lane only.
p611
aVWould Under 91 project expand to this bridge? Today we walked here with the City Engineer and The Director of Traffic and Parking. They support putting more lighting in here and doing a mural on the wall.\u000a\u000aIt would be great if the mural incorporated something related to the Mill River and the new trail! \u000a\u000aYay for forward thinking City Leaders in NHV. 
p612
aVdangerous left turn onto Water Street My commute at 5 pm weekdays \u000ainvolves a left turn from East onto Water Street.\u000aOften the left turn arrow is NOT on and people engage in highly unsafe actions to make a left turn without the help of the arrow. PLEASE keep the turn arrow on during rush hour!
p613
aVOther - city responsibility Please paint the double yellow line down the entire street! It is only on a small potion of the road and people do not stay on their side of the road. it is very dangerous!
p614
aVSPEEDING I'm hoping to start a discussion about the speeding problem on Clark Street. It's proximity to bars and restaurants, and it's use as a 'pass through' to get to Orange street could likely be the explanation for a large percentage of the speeding going on down this road as opposed to the quieter streets I've noticed in East Rock. Is there any way the city could look into speed humps or curbs to cut down on the speeding? As a resident, I've almost been nailed a few times each year crossing the street to get to my car. 
p615
aVRunning Reds & Illegal Parking by Post Office The intersection of Fountain, Alden, Harrison & Philip in front of the post office is a free-for-all of running red lights, illegal parking and illegal standing.  It is all the time during weekdays.  We need some enforcement here.
p616
aVNO TURN ON RED SIGN This sign should be taken down as there is no crossing traffic at this light, Since the 34 exit ramp has closed a few years back 
p617
aVConfusing traffic signals cause dangerous situations I've noticed this quite a few times over the years - when a car is waiting at the light to turn left out of Bruegger's parking lot to go up either Amity or Whalley, it almost always cuts in front of the traffic going straight through the intersection from Walgreens parking lot to Wright St. On the other hand, when cars attempt to drive straight through the intersection from the Brueggers parking lot to Walgreens parking lot, the left-turning traffic from Walgreens almost always cuts it off. Typical intersections have three directions to choose; this intersection has five. I think that there are too many options and factors involved for these directions to be sharing the same light signals, at least without any directional signage or oncoming traffic warnings, especially considering the vast width if this intersection. I have personally experienced too many close-calls with other drivers nearly slamming into my car when I simply attempt to drive straight across this intersection. 
p618
aVTraffic Signal / Pedestrian Signal A month ago, traffic headed west in left turn lane would never get a left turn arrow to get to Woodward Ave. and end up blocked by continuous red light.  This past week, traffic coming from Woodward Ave going north was given only a brief left arrow onto the I-95 ramp which promptly turned solid red, never allowing through traffic.  Every month I encounter light screw ups in this city.  Is all the equipment defective?  Or are these configuration mistakes by department of traffic control.  New Haven needs to jump on this right away.   Something more than an occasional failure is going on here.  Let's fix it before someone is killed in an all directions green failure.
p619
aVTraffic/Road Safety I have spent months trying to work with the NHPD and CT Transit on the speeding that goes on on Concord Street day and night.  The posted speed limit is 25 mph.  The buses often go well above that, particuliarly bad at night.  I have notified CT Transit about specifics on at least 50 occasions.  They send out "supervisors" who sit on Concord with their flashers on during the day.  They were here once at night, but the "supervisor" was on his screeen as buses flew by.  He did nothing.  Earlier in the day he followed a couple buses creeping down the Street.  My windows shake.  The buses use the double yellow line as a center marker for their bus.  Done.  I am asking if there are people willing to sign a petition to get them off of Concord.  And once again, I am asking NHPD to put someone down here for a period of time, giving out speeding tickets...not just you went through the stop sign tickets.  This is ridiculous.  The taxes are high and nothing gets done on this issue.  But they want to make Tweed bigger...noisier.  Done.  FIx this.  I am contacting my legislators and the Dept of Transportation.  I have given this enough of an effort, enough information and time for this to be corrected.  Perhaps speedbumps before someone gets killed.  I am told they are noisy.  Well not as noisy as a bigger airport, speeding buses and automobiles, non-stop.  Someone is going to get killed.  This is a residential street.  Not a highway.  Does it take someone getting killed?  Because there is enough documentation now that there has been a non-response.\u000a\u000aI attach a picture of the supervisor from CT transit with his blinkers on.  The buses are slow today since he came and sits where they all can see him.  WITH HIS FLASHERS ON!
p620
aVCar parks illegaly A beige car regularly (any day it can't get within 5 spots of the gym) parks illegally in front of the handicap parking spot. This makes it difficult to access the handicap spot and for traffic to approach the light without passing into the left side of the road due to the curve of the road. This happens between 6 and 8am. 
p621
aVDrivers turning right do not look for pedestrians Drivers at Intersection leaving Yale parking lots do not stop for pedestrians in crosswalk despite a red light, or are abusive to pedestrians using crosswalk . Should have a posted "No Turn on Red" or a police presence during commuting hours (i.e., 4-6 pm)
p622
assI15
(dp623
g2
S'Messiness & Eyesores'
p624
sg4
(lp625
Vsome one actually lives here?? These two houses are such an eyesore.  the yards are unkept.  Neighborhood kids are hanging out there as they think it is abandoned.  The back porch is falling off the house and the rear door is plywood.  I actually saw a squirrel and bird fighting each other as they were falling out of the 2nd floor window of 79.
p626
aVGraffiti 
p627
aVCamping in park Sleeping / defecating in archery field Edgewood park
p628
aVUnsightly area Bus stop adjacent to Foot Locker on Chapel Street looks like the city dump.  It's more than cigarette butts and empty nip bottles.  The Downtown Ambassadors need to spend a day in the area cleaning it up while the police need to rid the area of the frequent drug deals that occur.
p629
aVhomeless person this has been going on since june that i have notice, i get off willow street exit every morning and first this man was living under the bridge, then across the street inside the gated area and now behind the exit up on the hill. 
p630
aVGraffiti Tag on sill of yellow building.
p631
aVGraffiti On u-verse box
p632
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Aggressive pan handler now is waking past my shop and throwing his garbage in the door. Just got half a sandwich.  The vagrancy and loitering is hitting a new level. Does the city have any plan to address this problem. I am losing customers who don't want to walk down chapel street because of the all the harassment a drunks and very open drug dealing
p633
aVGraffiti 
p634
aVComputer Room New Haven Library The computer room at the New Haven Library's Msin Branch is disgusting. The conduct of the "patrons" is horrific. People blatantly ignore rules such as eating, drinking and , most pf all, cell phone usage. They have long, loud, conversations, oblivious to the other users' space.. Slurpping drinks, eating food and acting like wild animals. The staff does nothing to control them, and one can't blame the staff. These are not civil people! The need for a security person, one who will sit amidst this nightmare, and one who will enforce the rules, is, and must be, a top priority. It's become a shelter for people who have no respect for tjode who want to use the facilities in peace and QUIET! Otherwise, close the place once and for all, and use taxpayers' money to subsidize services that well meaning people can enjoy!
p635
aVloitering Every morning on the corner of cedar and minor where the Cornell health center is the people who go into rehad are leaving the area a mess...yes they have a person who pucks up trash but the trash always comes in front of our house....their are only 3 houses ob minor but everyday we are picking up their trash....they come every morning to walk their dogs and not pick up after them...I have seen on several occasions people using the bathroom ob the side of the building....if something can be done about this the residents would greatly appreciate it...
p636
aVOther Dead skunk
p637
aVGraffiti Pink graffiti on green traffic signal pole.
p638
aVGraffiti Side of  PCX. Got tagged
p639
aVnoxious smell in fair haven heights Really bad smell at night-like a mix of industrial fumes, exhaust and a pack of skunks. It's been coming and going for the last few weeks in the late evening after 9pm. What is it? Where could it be coming from?\u000aIt's now Fall 2012 and I have not smelled the fumes for the last 9 months. However I would not consider the issue to be resolved until the source of the smell has been determined and some action is taken to get rid of the fumes for good. 
p640
aVPrivate Property Issue It's been this ugly mess for over a week. Really makes the neighborhood look bad.
p641
aVHashtag: #RosaDeLauroExposed :graffiti Hashtag. #RosaDeLauroExposed . is on multiple paper signs stapled to utility poles, on Whitney Ave near ColdSpring St.
p642
aVGraffiti Please remove the HD tag that is here.
p643
aVPrivate Property Issue Pro park please clean up the cigarette butts and trash that fill our parking lot!
p644
aVBeggars The beggar who at this intersection for months is gone. However, for the past week there have been TWO beggars at this intersection with signs, one at corner of orange and trumbull, and one at the end of the connector. Throw their signs on the ground at the end of the day, and looks bad for all the folks entering the city
p645
aVBlight_NS all LOTS ON WINCHESTER LOTS NOT BEING CLEANED THOSE FROM DIVISION ST TO MORSE IS A HOT MESS 
p646
aVLED LIGHTS IN AN HISTORIC DISTRICT  The new LED street lamps on Q Ave are not a welcome addition. They are too bright and do not blend with the supposed historic district. Resembles a housing project. Takes away from the lights on the river and creates light pollution.
p647
aVGraffiti tags on telephone poles There are several of these tags on telephone poles along Exchange Street between Ferry and East Pearl Street
p648
aVDead Squirrel Removal on Sidewalk A dead squirrel has been lying on the sidewalk @ Lincoln St for 3 days. Please remove the decomposing animal
p649
aVDestroyed. This house has broken gutters, boarded up windows, and maybe even a missing door. No one is living there it has been forclosed.
p650
aVAbandoned VW - No License Plate A white VW Cabrio convertible, with no license plate, has been parked on the street in front of 155 Bradley Street for over two weeks. It has not moved. I called the non-emergency police to report it, four days ago, on 4/24. The dispatcher said an officer would call me. No one has called and the car is still there. There are a number of large filled plastic bags in the back seat. This is a zoned street and the car has a guest parking sticker hanging from the mirror. 
p651
aVMore Harp signs over night Even after the campaign was warned again about the $250 fine yesterday they but up 3 more signs on the corner of Orchard and Frontage Rd. All the other signs have not been removed yet. PW needs to start fining. 
p652
aVAbandoned Auto Abandoned town car. It's been there all day. Flat tire, open trunk, open hood.
p653
aVIllegal Parking Yesterday there were 5-10 cars parked on the grass near the river, and this isn't the first time I've seen this. I'm assuming this isn't permitted, as the park is finally looking beautiful after years of neglect. Can signs be posted saying that parking on the grass is illegal? The park is a wonderful addition to our neighborhood, and I'd hate to see it torn up by cars.
p654
aVCollapsed/Deteriorating Garage The garage in the rear of the property is collapsed, deteriorating, and overgrown.  It is unsightly for neighbors and potentially dangerous for residents. Please demo asap!
p655
aVParks Request Campers in the park.  A couple of tents with tarps erected in the park, adjacent to the West River, at the intersection of Blvd./Frontage and Legion Ave.\u000aAside from the obvious issue of these campers having no other place to live [?], there is the issue of human waste being dumped into the West River, along with the garbage strewn all over the place, in addition to the residents appearing intoxicated and threatening...\u000aOh and the sign that says: "Park Cosed at Sunset".
p656
aVNoise in/out of park Living near Lighthouse Park used to be a joy... now with the way people blast their music it's a headache. Literally. Between the music turned up to a deafening level, the horns, and the yelling in the street, it's unbearable. What happened to noise violations? Is there any way we can enforce the people VISITING the park to respect those who are PERMANENT residents in the area? 
p657
aVGarbage Blowing Around and Looking Trashy There is a PIKE International owned building here where they are remiss in picking up the garbage every week.  This is such an eyesore in and of itself but it also blows all around the street.
p658
aVNew Haven Green - trash everywhere Just a note to say that the past few days there has been a whole lot of trash scattered all over the New Haven Green. It seems much worse than other times, even compared to early last summer. Embarrassing to walk through there with visiting out-of-towners, and sad for those of us who really love using the Green as a public space. It's the center of the city we're so proud of; it shouldn't be covered in garbage.
p659
aVThree Prostitutes lounging on Corner  This morning I saw three prostitutes on the corner of Edgewood and Sherman, on the Edgewood side, hanging out near the corner, eying cars, displaying what they thought was a "come hither" look as people drove down the street. While I am a big girl and can stomach this, there were school children waiting for their buses across the street from this horror show.
p660
aVFlat Trailer parked for over two weeks in roadway VERY DANGEROUS\u000a\u000aThis flat trailer has been left on side of road with corner jutting into travel lane for SEVERAL WEEKS. There was a cone behind it, but has since vanished. Are all cops, public works  and traffic personal just turning a blind eye because its Yale related??? I would say yes.\u000a\u000aIf not acknowledged, will become a police matter.
p661
aVStreet Not Plowed Resident reports that St. Ronan Street is icy and also has not been fully plowed. A plow truck reportedly only made one pass down the center of the street. Please have plow trucks clear the street curb to curb. 
p662
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains There is a dead possum in the middle of the street. Cars have been going around it. Resident is worried it will be squished in the dark. 
p663
aVNoise Violation - Loud Generator can be heard from around block There is a very loud generator running but none of the lights are on in this house. It seems like their back-up generator has kicked on but nobody appears home. It is causing fumes and significant noise in the neighborhood. \u000a\u000aAre others concerned about this or know who owns this home and can contact them?
p664
aVPrivate Garbage pickup in the middle of the night John's Refuse and Recycling comes to pick up garbage in the parking lot of my building at 4:00am on Wednesday mornings. The sound wakes us up every time. I am sure that the company is breaking the law of the City of New Haven. PMC, the property manager, has not done anything to stop them. I hope that the city can handle this.
p665
aVGarbage trucks coming at 4:20am There are at least two garbage pick up companies, one pictured here is Trash Master, that come on a regular basis (several early morning per week) as early as 4:20am. They park right in front of my bedroom window, and I am sure many others bedroom windows, for at least 15 minutes while making very loud noises as they wheel out the trash containers and mechanically lift and dump them, then return the containers. Usually both companies come within an hour of each other. I believe it illegal for them to come this early. When I call the NHPD they offer to send an officer out, but by the time they arrive the garbage truck is gone and I am not staying up an extra hour waiting for the PD to arrive to give a statement. No win!
p666
aVOther Dumpster sticking out into road.
p667
assI16
(dp668
g2
S'Storm Drains, Sewers & Water Related'
p669
sg4
(lp670
VAsphalt Debris Blocking Storm Drain Asphalt and other construction debris from the recent milling and repaving of Whalley Ave. has completely blocked this storm drain. Exact location is on the north side of Whalley near Blake Street, under a giant oak tree. 
p671
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Water flowing out of manhole cover.
p672
aVEVERY HIGH TIDE IN FRONT OF 150 MIDDLETOWN AVE (UNDER BRIDGE) THIS IS RIDICULUS THAT OUR STATE WOULD OVERLOOK SUCH A BIG PROBLEM, SHOULD I TAKE A BOAT IN TO WORK?? I BET NEW HAVEN WONT BUY ME A BOAT TO GET THROUGH, SO FIX IT!!!!!!!!
p673
aVOther - city responsibility Water constantly backing up on Concord when it rains.  No drainage on the Tweed side of Concord near Beecher for more than a block.  Please add drain immediately.  Thank you.
p674
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains catch basin under train overpass is clogged
p675
aVStanding Water Issue  Resident reports a drainage issue on the street. The road is such that rainwater has a difficult time draining. Ponding occurs and the standing water stagnates causing foul odors. 
p676
aVSewage Pipe spilling on sidewalk Gross sewage water coming out of broken pipe in sidewalk median.  next to school, yuck.
p677
aVBlocked Storm Drains The storm drains on York (between Elm Street and Grove Street) are blocked by snow banks. Meting snow is causing the street to flood. Please send someone to this location to clear the blockage. 
p678
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains The last rain storm water from the street  flooded basement
p679
aVDirty Catch Basin the catch basin in front of 889-891 Congress needs to be cleaned it is already stinking very bad and its not even summer yet.  \u000a\u000a\u000aIt is now April 9th catch basin is starting to smell up the entire side of house when people walk by it is very embarassing to have that smell right in front of my home.  Why change the drains to catch basins if your not going to maintain them routinely.  They really really smell so badddddd!  Please hurry and come clean them.  
p680
aVPublic Space, Streets and Drains Clogged sewer drain
p681
aVDrainage Issue  Resident reports that the street floods during heavy rains. There are very few storm drains on this street.  
p682
aVFlooding cause by change to Tweed fence line Believe this is a DEEP issue but giving Tweed and the City the opportunity to fix asap.  Since the fence and "improvements" were completed to fence line, Dean has been flooded in the most moderate of rainfalls at each intersecting street.  Pretty sure something was done that was not approved under the plan signed off on by DEEP.  My sense is they cut more of the natural habitat down that what was allowed AND built up the Creek edge.  Please fix now.
p683
aVBlocked Storm Drain Resident reports a blocked storm drain at this location. The blockage is causing the drain to flood over during rain and other inclement weather. Please clear the blockage. 
p684
aVCurbs and road repair needed Flooding is a constant problem from here to corner of Whalley Avenue on the even numbered side of Emerson Street. Lack of curbs,sidewalks and a level road surface make it unsafe for the residents on this street! Alderperson please help... many elementary school and handicapped students walk this way.
p685
aVBlocked Storm Drain  Resident reports a blocked storm drain in front of this address. The drain is blocked from the inside, and flooding occurs during inclement weather. Resident is worried that this will create a ice hazard during winter weather. 
p686
assI17
(dp687
g2
S'Bikers and Haters'
p688
sg4
(lp689
VNeed Better Bike Racks Yale's shower pass program for commuters is great - but the bike racks outside Payne Whitney Gym are awful
p690
aVSigns A "turn left" bicycle destination placard for Union Station was installed here. It was supposed to be a "go straight" placard.
p691
aVGolden opportunity for bike box A bike box would be great where the northbound bike lane on Prospect Street ends at Trumbull.\u000a\u000aWhy?\u000a*There is a high volume of right turns across the bike lane, leading to a high risk of a right hook incident.\u000a*The bike lane ends, so bicyclists need to start merging out into the lane anyway.\u000a*This entire intersection is being rebuilt, so marginal cost of striping a bike box will be lower than any other intersection in the entire city.
p692
aVSigns / Bus Shelters / Pavement Markings Could use some more bike racks here. Thanks!
p693
aVPublic Space & Streets There is only 1 bike rack on this corner, but it's right against a planter. Another rack or two would be great, but moving the planter would be a good start. 
p694
aVTraffic/Road Safety The amount of bicyclists who disregard traffic laws and safety in and around downtown New Haven is downright scary. Today I was nearly run down by a cyclist who not only ran a red light but also ran right through the crosswalk while I was in the middle of crossing - to be clear I had the walk signal and hence the right of way. I see this kind of blatant disregard for law, life, and limb happening more and more. I'm not sure if it is ignorance or what but something has to be done before someone gets seriously hurt or killed. I was thinking maybe a public campaign to advise people of the laws and remind them that bicyclists have to adhere to the same road laws as drivers but I'm not sure how to get that started. 
p695
aVExtremely dangerous RR-street crossing for cyclists Be very careful crossing the tracks on your bike. Go slow and cross perpendicular to the rails.  Signage is desperately needed.  See http://groups.yahoo.com/group/elmcitycycling/message/8023\u000a\u000aresolution2012
p696
aVTree branches encroaching on bike lane. The trees planted along the right side ( as one is heading away from New Hallville) need trimming.  The lower branches force a cyclist into an already tight lane of traffic (with the central island narrowing the lanes there).   
p697
aVBike lane needed from Clinton Avenue to Orange Street A bike lane is needed between the existing Clinton Ave. and Orange Street bike lanes. If you agree click, "I want this fixed too\u201d and comment. Pictures welcomed. We especially want to hear from folks currently biking from Chatham Square Neighborhood to any place north of the Green or beyond. Come on people we can get this! Here is one proposed route: \u000ahttp://maps.google.com/maps/ms?ie=UTF8&hl=en&msa=0&msid=103243076916819646367.000472711c007a83ca13b&t=h&z=15
p698
aVBike route proposal: Whitney is five lanes wide along this stretch; the center turning lane is overkill and a waste of space. One lane could be converted to a two-way bike route (preferably elevated 6 inches) connecting downtown to Hamden; it would make the street a lot safer for all users.
p699
aVBicycle Improvements Needed to Connect East Rock and Fair Haven - Sharrows are not a substitute for bikeable streets I ride this route often and feel that a bike route from Clinton Avenue, across Lombard and Humphrey to Orange, continues to be sorely needed.\u000a\u000aI feel that this issue should remain open until a route that all persons -- age 8 to 80 -- feel comfortable riding their bikes on.  Although sharrows are a minor improvement over nothing, adding sharrows to the road simply does not do that.\u000a\u000a65 people previously voted on this issue: "Bike lane needed from Clinton Avenue to Orange Street," but that issue is being closed because sharrows have been installed. http://www.seeclickfix.com/issues/8658-bike-lane-needed-from-clinton-avenue-to-orange-street\u000a\u000aSharrows are ineffective at increasing cycling rates unless speeds are reduced to 20MPH. \u000a\u000aPortland, OR, and New York City, NY, are currently doing this along hundreds of miles of their residential streets.\u000a\u000aStudies show that very few people will feel comfortable bicycling on roads unless speeds are strictly capped at 20MPH -- no matter what kind of paint you have on the road. \u000a\u000aAchieving these average speeds along bike routes can be done through various traffic calming and traffic engineering methods. Berkeley has pioneered this decades ago this with its "bicycle boulevards," and many cities have since followed.\u000aIt is best to call them "slow streets", since they have a tremendous benefit for pedestrians and property owners as well.\u000a\u000aThe sharrows here should be replaced with street engineering that meets the standards of the NACTO -- whether bike lanes, buffered bike lanes, traffic calmed boulevards, or some other feature: http://nacto.org/cities-for-cycling/design-guide/ . 
p700
assI18
(dp701
g2
S'Public Transit'
p702
sg4
(lp703
VFrequent Equipment Break Down Shoreline east train has had equipment failures very frequently in the last month. Two complete breakdowns requiring passengers to transfer trains and delays in excess of 2 hours. No A/C. Multiple cars with extreme heat to the point of potential medical risks. Price increases with worse service. This is not a New Haven issue, Union station seems a geographical headquarters for trains in CT. Hope to rally customers to complain to the DOT regarding this poor service.
p704
aVBus Stop Needs to Be Cleared  Caller reports that the bus stop at this location has not been cleared. Snow banks are difficult to climb over and the sidewalk is very slippery. Please send crews to clear this location. 
p705
aVOther - city responsibility -- Please move the bus hub. I say this as a low-income person who sometimes takes the bus (when I have no choice):\u000aCan we please move the bus hub away from the Green, at long last?  Let's stop pretending we're one big happy community, or one society.  \u000aEstablish bus hubs on lower Dixwell, the Boulevard, and Foxon, where there's more room and less interclass tension.  This would also alleviate many of the complaints from Downtown posted to this site, including the loitering and drug activity.
p706
assI19
(dp707
g2
S'Oil,Gas,& other Utilities'
p708
sg4
(lp709
VOil Leak in Harbor Several people reported this to authorities including the Coast Guard to report the major oil slick on Monday evening while watching the NH fireworks. We never saw anyone investigate.
p710
aVReally bad Comcast connection The Comcast internet connection at our place has been repeatedly on and off for more than three weeks. Comcast, please fix the problem.
p711
ass.